I keep a small calendar clipped to my 3-tier unit so I can have it handy at all times. The small size is perfect for referring to dates of a particular week and when using my date stamp to create journaling cards.
And yet in the United States, we continue to focus on producing ever increasing amounts of energy, believing wrongly that greater energy use will always mean an increasing quality of life. Any person who dares to talk about cutting our energy use usually gets shouted down as a Luddite who hates the poor and cares for plants and animals more than human beings. Keep in mind that compared to America, European countries collectively run an economy larger than that of the United States; generally have considerably lower levels of inequality; provide universal health care with better overall outcomes; and enforce stricter environmental, health and safety regulations--all on half the energy per person. Vaclav Smil illustrates this phenomenon in a recent article entitled "Science, energy, ethics, and civilization." (PDF) He notes that there is an inflection point for many quality of life measures at around 100 gigajoules/year per person. Above that, indicators improve very little. For comparison the United States uses 330 gigajoules/year per person. Smil thinks consumption above 200 gigajoules is actually counterproductive.
when it was those supposed heavenly men on horses and armour
optional: additional greens (more kale, parsley or spinach)
The truth is, new authors are practically invisible. Publishing companies loose money on first books, an average of $20,000. Is your manuscript worth betting $20,000 on? That's what you're asking for when you send a submission to a publisher.
USATF CEO Doug Logan has set a goal of 30 medals at the London Olympic Games. A mark we have yet to achieve in any Games or World Championships to date. Most recently we won 23 medals in track and field at the Beijing Games and 22 medals at last year’s World Championships in Berlin. So in the past two global championships we have been at about three quarters of goal.
* Daniel Zalkus is an illustrator with a passion for on-the-spot drawing. You can see some of Daniel's own excellent work at his website.
“Jesus Christ is above all rule, authority, power and dominion, every name invoked, over every title bestowed in this age and the next. God has placed all things under His feet and anointed Him as Head over all things for His gathered assembly (A Headship that is exercised throughout His gathered assembly). This gathered assembly is His body, the fullness of Him who fills All in All.” Paul of Tarsus, Ephesians 1:22-23
No, a South African black is not racist, he is the most forgiving, accomodating , respectful and kind and gentle.
If I did not have help with the stroller and stairs, I probably would have put the baby in the Beco and just slung the folded-up stroller over my shoulder (there is a strap for that). Once I exited the subway system, then I would have put the baby back in the stroller. It wouldn't have been super easy, but certainly would have been do-able.
Her lawyer is appealing, on the grounds that Thailand’s constitution guarantees defendants the right to a public trial.
Lawyers have an interesting and complicated role to play in the democratization process. We (at least those of us who at some point in our careers practice law) are trained to approach problems not from our own perspectives but on behalf of a client. In the litigation and dispute resolution context, we are accustomed to assessing the facts of a situation (i.e., a case), spotting relevant legal issues, and advocating our client's best case against an adversary's best case. In the transactional context, we negotiate the best deal we can for our client.
One person stood out from the crowd who would approach me each time I went out and congregate at all hours of the day and night on our balcony. Not because he was any more persistant than the others, but because he was the only one who I felt made the effort to get to know the real me. I'd met L the previous year and had felt the connection then too, but had never acted on it. This time, L was determined to establish a relationship. I was equally determined to remain single.
Lay the leaves on the side of the plate, dress with some balsamic vinegar and place the redcurrants and a quarter of a fig on top. Finally, plate up the femlletés and drizzle over plenty of sauce before garnishing with a fresh sprig of parsley.
- Fearless, Independent Character, Hit & Run, Lightning Reflexes (4+ Invulnerable Save), Move Through Cover, Preferred Enemy (Aliens), Stealth
- Continue my crafting passions. Targets: 10 scrapbooking layouts, 200 cards and 10 sewing items completed.
My alone time came at night, when I lay in the fold-out bed in the spare room, listening to sappy rock ballads on my Walkman and pining for my boyfriend. All the pretenses fell away in the dark, and I was not a poised young adult at all. Sure, I’d felt homesick before — I was one of those kids who cried herself to sleep at summer camp for the first few days — but being on another continent gave the feeling a peculiar, echoing dimension. I didn’t want to go home early, yet I counted the days until my departure.
Often a transgender teen will continue to suffer gender dysphoria into adulthood. They may feel that they are a man trapped in a woman’s body, or vice versa. Such persons may decide to seek transgender therapy. If so, they will get psychological counseling, and be treated with hormones so their bodies will take on the appearance of the desired physical sex.
So here I am with the first day of Year 3 in this whole thing. I'm right around 155, still fitting into my size 6 clothes (which is awesome because it's really expensive to keep buying new clothes). I admit my habits haven't been as stellar as usual in the past 2 weeks, but that doesn't stop me from getting right back on track today. I have another 5K scheduled for March 25th and it's helping me keep in focus. I still have a goal around 145 in mind, which is 10 pounds away. It seems SO far, even compared to when I was 200 pounds and looking at my 150 goal as INSANE! But I did it. And I can do it again. Even if it takes all of Year 3, I know I'll get there at some point. And stay there! I just have to keep reminding myself of where I started.
...by drinking milk fresh from the beast! That's Yussef, 13, taking a swig. I didn't try it, but Abby did, brave soul that she is. She declared it "salty and warm."
The Shabby Girls thank you ALL for sharing your special paper crafting talents with us here in the Tea Room! The talent and inspiration continuously amazes and inspires us all!!! Your talent and creativity makes it nearly impossible to pick winners each week! And now, without further ado, here are the creations that caught my eye this week for capturing the essence of the 'Love is in the Air' challenge by using the colors from the inspiration photo AND a mail or postage element:
In a blistering take-down of Rick Scott’s last-call signature on JD Alexander’s Polytechnic takeover, the editors of the Tampa Bay Times let the Florida governor have it in an editorial this morning:
Heat oven to 350 degrees.
Size: 5.5"x5.5"
In more other news, Gandalf has had 2 full days in kitty confinement with no spraying in the bathroom whatsoever. I visit him often to cuddle, scritch and hold him. Last night I gave him 15 minutes out on the patio. I watched “the business end” every moment as he walked around sniffing fresh air and stretching his legs without incident. Whew. I returned him to kitty confinement just before going to bed. We shall see.
When Nadya decided she wanted to get pregnant the first time, she was not married, Ed says, so she turned to a friend to be her sperm donor. After that child was born, she decided to have another baby, then a third child and a fourth.
Monday: Shrimp Gorditas
For the past six months or so, I've almost exclusively read non-fiction or graphic novels. Or re-read books I've read before. In non-fiction, I prefer biographies or books about murders and WWII. Some of the books I've read recently for the first time are Auschwitz: A Doctor's Eyewitness Account by Miklos Nyiszli, The Elephant to Hollywood by Michael Caine, Catch 22 by Joseph Heller, The Stranger Beside Me by Ann Rule, SuperFreakonomics: Global Cooling, Patriotic Prostitutes, and Why Suicide Bombers Should Buy Life Insurance by Steven D. Levitt and Stephen J. Dubner, Emergency: This Book Will Save Your Life by Neil Strauss, God, If You're Not Up There, I'm F*cked: Tales of Stand-Up, Saturday Night Live, and Other Mind-Altering Mayhem by Darrell Hammond, This Is a Book by Demetri Martin, Balthazar: An Evernight Novel by Claudia Gray, Spandau The Secret Diaries by Albert Speer, Superman for All Seasons by Jeph Loeb and Tim Sale, Batman: Cacophony by Kevin Smith and Walter Flanagan, Batman: Knightfall, Part One: Broken Bat by Doug Moench, Chuck Dixon. Here are some books that I've recently re-read Mother Night by Kurt Vonnegut, Cat's Cradle by Kurt Vonnegut, Good Omens: The Nice and Accurate Prophecies of Agnes Nutter, Witch by Neil Gaiman and Terry Pratchett, American Psycho by Bret Easton Ellis, Survivor by Chuck Palahniuk , and half of The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy by Douglas Adams.
· non-fiction
So this is the sketch
They wrap up the letter telling the reader how they are working hand in hand with the counselors of the organization by making a contribution and praying.
2010.07.24 Iraq Basra 1 4 An innocent civilian is murdered by a Jihad bomber.
Make me feel lonely yet complete.
If the Slave Owner Regime was so Brilliant, then why didn't they investigate other Countries with obamcare type, government controlled healthcare.
Knowing the truth would have value in itself. If we could reach a common understanding of the conflict of the past, it would also help lay the foundation for racial and political reconciliation. The goals the Truth and Reconciliation Commission (TRC) was mandated to attain were important.
“ She is improving but I am still having problems getting her to eat, and she often sits shaking. She is still on antibiotic injections every other day.”
Apparently she doesn't read the rest of the Globe & Mail ... or pay attention to what is going on around her either. Me, I would think that someone paid to write opinion columns for a major national newspaper should have a clue about what the current government is doing, for example... but hey, what do I know... I obviously missed the memo.
who happened to have a daughter my age..Sandra..
2:00 PM Lana Dugmag
Kasher said much that I might have anticipated, but a great deal more, too, that placed Israel’s recent wars in a context that I had not fully drawn before. I was particularly struck by his explanation for the change in IDF approach over recent years to the endangering of its soldiers – the altered balance it has drawn, prompted by Kasher, when it comes to the safety of its personnel, on the one hand, and the “non-dangerous neighbors” of terrorists, on the other.
64. Done something dumb while drunk? - Are you kidding? I only get more fascinating, the drunker I become. Doesn't everyone?
WHAT: Press conference to discuss manhole explosions and improved coordination by Con Edison
My battle to pardon my faults has been fed by more than the regrets of one relational failure. I’ve been singing Sia’s “Breathe Me.” Feeling unsafe having lost myself again with no one else to blame. Unbearably aware of my own need to be held, to be cared for after so much coldness. So worried about the attraction between me and these men who’ve shown so little respect for my emotions. Concerned by this pattern of almost romances and awful endings I’ve had. Worried that it’s not enough to simply say, “Lesson learned, I won’t do that again.”
2. By-The-Hour is only good if you know that the majority of your group members will order the higher priced cocktails and wine or if they are heavy drinkers. (Some companies do not consider this to be socially responsible anymore.)
Welcome, Emerald!
This week was much better than last week..some of which I attribute to beginning my week with a Sunday workout of Intensati which, if you’ve never heard of it is kind of aerobics mixed with positive thinking mixed with yoga and its wicked fun! The first time I did it, I thought it was a little cheesy and I thought, jeez I’m glad I’m doing this in my living room while Russ is at work, but if you drop your judgements about it, it’s actually really powerful.
"I had that same expression when the paramedics told me."
‘I don’t know. It just came to me in a flash this morning whilst I was washing my hair.’
If you are smart, you may go over your papers on you own . Once you are in line, you’ve made you choice and unless the guard urges you out of line, you have to go through that door. You really have to mess up once you are on the other side to get sent back out to try again.
Fortunately I did not need to have an "after" photo. After a day and a half of wind, torrential rains, high tides and being stuck indoors - Irene left us with little damage. We were very, very fortunate and I am glad the full forecast for this area did not materialize. Don't get me wrong, we were not unphased. Several people in North Carolina and Virginia lost their lives, some had extensive property damage, and there was great inconveniences all over. But it could have been so much worse. All in all, my mind tells me Irene fell short of her older sister Isabel and well below the 2009 nor'easter.
Those are the well-known appointments, so that list is not meant to be complete.
Journalist Henryk M. Broder calls his lifelong confrontation with the subject of anti-Semitism “a kind of obsession.” The basis for his newest book with the title “Forget Auschwitz” is “state-sponsored hypocrisy” in Germany, the author said onThursday at the Leipzig Book Fair.
There were raised eyebrows when despite his criminal past church officials allowed De Pedis to be buried in the crypt of the Basilica of Sant’Apollinare in central Rome.
How can I help her and leave her Christianity intact? I’m reading these “Is your partner emotionally abusing you?” questionnaires. Here’s an example:
“I know you and your mother are going to the beach soon,” she says, “but what about if I pay to send you on a special vacation, just for you?”
With the secret diary, his real fathers name in question and an overwhelming feeling of desire for Hyacinth, Gareth had his hands full.
"I have told you this so that my joy may be in you
Defence experts say that by successfully enriching uranium, to make bombs of the type dropped on Hiroshima nearly 70 years ago, the North would be able to significantly build it up stocks of weapons-grade nuclear material.
The Surgeons decided to wash their hands of the whole thing.
I’m already annoyed at the pedals and bike shoes. I can imagine at least the clips breaking before I reach Halifax.
you know what is coming next...POSTCARDS.
appeared on so far ...
The above photo shows four of the many boxes I have stored in the closet in my writing office. There are many boxes in this closet, and in the office there are additional files of materials that I have accumulated over the years--mostly for the purpose of providing inspiration for my writing or as a record of things that I have written.
3.) A major upheaval will take place.
I just had my 56th birthday in April. I am happy that the Lord has given me another year of life but with each added year, my body is starting to wither and sag... I realize that I am now an old lady with gray hair, weak knees, wrinkles and a memory that is slowly forgetting...but happy I also get to read, rock, play and love on the grand kids... happy/sad
“How did what happen, chief?”
newsletters. The possibilities are endless..."
I want to thank each and every one of your for coming to my blog, leaving me comments and supporting me these past few years. My 4 year blogiversary is coming up in a few days. I started my blog on Jan 3rd, 2008. Never in my wildest dreams did I think I would still be doing this 4 years later. It has been an incredible experience. That being said...this is going to be my last blog post for a while. Life has just gotten too busy for me to keep up with posting each week. As my dedicated followers have noticed, in the first few years I posted almost daily. Within the past year, I'm down to once a week and even then I miss a few. I'm not deleting my blog by all means so you may see a post from me now and then but it definitely won't be on a regular basis. Thank you so much for all of the love and support you have all shown me! I wish you all a safe and happy 2012!
7 What's In The Fridge?
I printed out a design to fit on regular paper and pasted it on from the outside. The glass was double glass which made tracing a task!
There are 140 weapons approved for disposal, Ysassi said Wednesday. Court orders have been obtained to destroy 70 guns. Five others are evidence in pending criminal cases, and 65 have serial numbers cleared by Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives for people to claim.
Yet in some ways South Africa is like no other nation. South Africa has a historical pattern which has determined a current reality which must be understood if we are to find effective solutions for its current malaise. It has a complex problem structure with a unique mix of human and physical resources which contribute to both its strengths and its weaknesses.
Minor Flaws make the characters memorable in readers minds, these give the character individuality, but other than that do not affect the story in any way. They can be a scar, an accent, biting the lower lip, twirling the moustache, a girl constantly flinging her hair back. A protagonist can have several minor flaws, each having no effect on the plot.
You better watch your step
I hate shorts and only wear them when I absolutely have to. Like doing yard work... which I NEVER do. Casual cotton skirts are my subsitute for shorts in the summer. They are cool, casual options for us ladies that don't have the prettiest of thighs.
Anyway, that’s what I felt like writing about today. It was more for me than any of you but I hope you enjoyed it at least a little.
34 rue Yves Toudic
This bath in the latest Living etc is fantastic. Whoever gets ready here is one lucky someone. At first glance, it’s clean and simple, but the details are high on style and personality…
**I apologize for the sheer harshness and negativity conveyed within this piece. Writing this seemed to be the only way that I could vent the rollcoaster of a day that I endured, so I display my thoughts here.
Why not have athletic directors and coaches face clawbacks too? If the NCAA imposes penalties for problems that existed during a coach or director’s employment, why not require them to return some salary and bonuses to the university — even if they have moved on to another job? After all, many coaches get bonuses for good academic performance by their teams, why shouldn’t there be penalties for poor performance?
We can certainly debate the merits and the accuracy of that observation, but it’s one that has stuck in my mind since he said it. To that list, I would add the discovery of a wiretap in Philadelphia mayor John Street’s office, and the constitutionally questionable attempts at redrawing the congressional districts in the state of Texas.
Anywho..yep its the 25th of the month yet again which means another christmas card blog hop!!
I cut a 4 3/4' x 3" piece of plaid. I used a different border punch across the top and bottom of this piece. After punching, I attached it on top of the sage green card stock on the front of the card.
I have also started selling Scentsy, which is like a wickless candle- no flames- the wax is warmed in a warmer by a light bulb...the wax is only warmed to 120 degrees (which is cooler than the stuff that the lady puts on my lip to wax it!) and because there is no flame- it is safe for around babies, pets, and if you accidentally leave it on it is okay- just uses electricity!
I craved grilled cheese and rice and French toast and oatmeal… I helped my aunt (we’ll call her Vernita) cook a potato, egg and cheese dish, and, surprisingly, when she asked if I wanted a bite I turned it down. Even though it looked and smelled delectable, the bad angel came back. “Look at that. Let’s see… Potatoes–not a safe food. Cheese–fattening. Eggs–too much cholesterol. And besides, do you see all the calories?! Because I count about a thousand. And you know that is way over your calorie limit, missy.”
God says, ”Come home. Here you will find rest.”
Moist and delicious turkey burgers with a bit of a bite, sauced with a lovely blue cheese dressing and served on a toasted bun. Fabulous!
What? A novel? A whole novel? That's a lot of words!
I read and loved classics such as LITTLE WOMEN, THE SECRET GARDEN, THE YEARLING, and TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD. I also read Slyvia Plath and poetry across the spectrum as well as adult fiction.
English and Afrikaans were compulsory language subjects throughout the entire high school period from grade 8 to 12. We were fortunate enough not to be targeted by communist activists, or liberal protesters, but despite our dislike for certain subjects, and also certain teachers who seemed to take immense pleasure in swinging the cane on our backsides (or hands in the case with girls), not once did it cross our minds that a mass protest march will make our problems disappear!
But I have two side yards that are walled and sun screened that hold all sorts of utilities.
However, Intego reported yesterday that while (according to Charles Arthur), 7Art had stopped distributing PremierOpinion, it has re-introduced it into the installation of some of its screensavers. Having taken a quick look on one of my test machines, I can confirm that this is the case, though the process does now seem to be closer to the optional installation described by 7Art (though there’s an ambiguity to the wording that I can’t say I like). I can also confirm that other security software also detects packages available from this site as adware or spyware.
Christmas Eve i got into a car accident - so Elmo (yes, my car has a name) can't wink at people on the passenger side - i think he's REALLY missing it and i know i am too - everyone was totally fine in the accident - thank god - just material things to get fixed - so all in all i'm not upset over it at all - even as much as i love Elmo, i know he can get fixed and there's no reason to get upset over material possessions - things could have been worse! *heads up to you Universe looking out for me*
Have you noticed a decline in evangelism in your local church?
Using the Johansen cointegration test, we find that there is no long-run relationship
well had a really wonderful weekend celebrating the graduation of two very special people, spending time with our precious baby boy, and being super productive around the house.
I'm really happy and excited to join the JAG Corps in the Air Force. School starts Monday, I fly early tomorrow morning to Maxwell AFB, Alabama. I think 2 months is a perfect little break for Klein and it's at the appropriate time as we get ready to move to Valdosta. When we get there it's game on again. The plan is to give her one month here when I get back to get a good base going on again, which won't be a challenge because 2 months isn't a huge amount of time. Then I will take it easy on her for the first month in Georgia and just let her adapt to her new climate. That shouldn't be too terribly challenging for her considering we are going down in altitude by about 4,000 ft. The humidity will make a difference, but we'll get used to it. Hawaii was humid too! After that, it's game on and I hope for us to be out competing by July.
By our love, freedom is found for the captive. Christ alone conquered all that would come against us as He chose the cross and soon sent His Spirit to dwell within us. By His Spirit, the impossible is made possible.
Closing Tree Quote – DIANNE ROBBINS (diannerobbins.com)
Apart from the PPPA, they have also demanded the repeal or review of other restrictive laws that affect the media – the Official Secrets Act, Sedition Act and Internal Security Act (ISA), among these.
This is a new season in our lives and a time to plant ourselves in a new place. There is the assurance of new ministry opportunities and of new relationships. Yes, He is making a road in the wilderness And rivers in the desert for us, and we are thankful that our Father loves and cares for us.
6. Visit the Boyer Factory (home of the Mallo Cup). If you make prior arrangements, you can tour the factory. If not, take a virtual tour online while eating the candy you purchased. (yep)
Three questions come to mind immediately:
So fluorescently labeled target sequences that bind to a probe sequence generate a signal that depends on the strength of the hybridization determined by the number of paired bases, the hybridization conditions (such as temperature), and washing after hybridization. Total strength of the signal, from a spot (feature), depends upon the amount of target sample binding to the probes present on that spot. Microarrays use relative quantization in which the intensity of a feature is compared to the intensity of the same feature under a different condition, and the identity of the feature is known by its position.
Now I'm heading out the door for a couple days in Fairmont B.C.
it leads me a step closer to who you really are.
Okay, it has been some time, too long time, but the studies and work have simply been too big a bite for me to also write on a regular basis. At least for now. I’m not giving up though, and now I found something interesting enough, that I really wanted to share it with all of my readers out there.
Women Leaders as Agents of Change: Caribbean Regional Colloquium. (“In a personal video message, Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton sent her greetings and congratulations to participants and organizers. Participants received the video enthusiastically, commenting that they felt encouraged and inspired by the Secretary’s interest and support.”)
You never know what might happen.
Me: OK, they were drawbridges
The negative side of the 4 can prove dogmatic to an excess, narrow-minded, and repressive. Skin-deep people turn you off, and you lack the tact to keep your feelings from showing to those in your sphere of influence. Additionally, the negative 4 has a tendency to get so caught up in the daily routine of affairs that they can miss the big picture and subsequently forfeit major opportunities that come along.
And while I sit, I'm thinking about the future. I'm getting lots of opportunities to work/volunteer and to explore new ideas at the moment - it's almost a bit overwhelming because we don't have that much time in the week (and, of course, everything seems to happen on the same day) but it's exciting! But it is bringing a whole set of questions with it. Do I want to be doing all these things? Where is the future going to be brightest? I don't want to answer this with regard to finances, but logically, I know that should be a consideration. None of the things I love are ever going to earn me a living, some of the things I love aren't even possibilities - I want, want, want to write but just don't have time to squeeze it in right now, just look how hard it's been to commit regularly to this blog! But I am loving making time for it this week...
Who are you?
During the massive secularist rally on the National Mall in Washington, D.C., Gaylor and Barker addressed the crowd, using language that both invigorated their non-believing audience and poked fun at people of faith.
3. People do the Best They Can with What They Have.
Boiled Potatoes : 1 medium
The Pour House – 74th and Nieman
Basilica of San Lorenzo is one of the churches I didn’t visit the first time I was in Florence. I love the main duomo, but it will be nice to see a more understated church. This basilica holds the Medici mausoleum, which, I know it’s morbid, but there’s something cool about seeing where people you’ve read about in history books are buried, and you’re standing where they stood and worshiped. Also, Michelangelo designed the library inside, and it’s always great to see anything Michelangelo thought up, considering he’s a genius. As if the Medici mausoleum and Michelangelo library weren’t enough, but the pulpits were Donatello’s very last works! This is a basilica full of art, history and Florentine greats!
Today's guest post is from our fabulous Blogger of the Month, Alisha of Musings of a Manic Mama. I cannot believe that this is her FIRST guest post! I am absolutely honored that she is debuting on Mom Got Blog...and I know, positively, without a doubt, this will be the first of many that she will share with the blogosphere!!
Rohrer said the 2011 show will be used as a “dry run” for the museum's 40th anniversary. Planned for Father's Day weekend in 2012, the anniversary air show will be a chance for the community to recognize the museum's founders and the sacrifices of those who have contributed to the museum over the past four decades.
8. Sam Rockwell
let salvation spring up,
I'm ecstatic to be part of The Hunt UK blog tour because I finished reading this book a week ago and loved it! If you missed my review (posted yesterday) click here to read it. Today, I'm going to be giving you Gene's Top Ten Survival Tips for Hepers but before I do, here's a bit more information about the book:
Network marketing is probably one of the most effective and powerful ways of increasing your income. Affiliate marketing provides everybody a chance to make a profit using his/her talents and potential. Since network marketing or multi-level marketing programs are easy to join, with low start-up costs and pay a commission purely on performance, more and more people are considering this type of business.
In her latest post, blogger Elaine Taylor-Klaus talks about how her family was served a gluten-containing meal on Delta airlines that was marked gluten-free. This is the third time that this has happened! Even worse, Delta Airlines places the blame on her.
Chris Pohl: In fact it was the time when I tried to quit my contract with Maschinenwelt, a berlin label. I was under contract with Seelenkrank, and the guy did not want to let me go so I changed the name into Blutengel and signed in at Out of line! I took the chance to change also music and style a little, away from the fetish themes and more into gothic, vampire. So Blutengel was born!
–put crafting mats in bank from anywhere. All of the same mat goes into a single stack (limitless as far as I can see).
We purchased things bits at a time and in phases to help ease the pain a bit. And when I look at the cost of some of the higher scale designs for similar pieces which run anywhere from $800-$2800, I am happy to have a custom piece that we did ourselves for a fraction of that price.
Get up and roll, just make that Rootsie Rooooooooool!!
Joe's Petite Micro-flare
It's also funny how drinking beer never seems like work, but I swear, the minute it does, it's over... I'll take a long break and have a beer.
30th Nov 2011 – MVP Release
All tinies love my dollies,
If Clint hadn't been driving, I'd have locked bumpers with this lady and arranged for 30 minutes worth of her services when we finally came to a stop.
One movie that every man who has been screwed over by a woman should watch. When aspiring architect who words for a greeting cards company sees Summer Finn he instantly falls in love with her. They are together for a total of 500 days. Without giving the story away a up and down relationship pursues. The movie jumps from the end of the relationship and then back to the start of it. Some really good humour as well some seriousness in it to.
Well the gaming convention is done and was a fine success. Now we have Erik’s confirmation to go and then we really need to get things done.
I think I’ll try to transition to doing some landscapes, after I finish with some things on my to-do list this week.
READ THIS VERY SLOWLY.. IT’S PRETTY PROFOUND.
We go to places as two
Meanwhile, my red peppers were roasting away in the oven.
Notes: HSPU are 45# plates (not comp style, traditional bumpers) with an ab mat in the middle for the gentlemen, and 25# plates with an ab mat for the ladies. Hands must be on the plates and no part of the hand may be hanging off the plate. Both plates must be in contact with the ab mat, but do not have to be in contact with the wall. Kipping IS allowed.
What a great achievement, if it could be done. But will the Government rush into disaster by pushing an already over-stretched public service to rollout a huge, complex scheme in record time? Will it be a repeat of the roof-insulation and school capital works program fiascos?
Activate the Pink Rectangle layer, Selections, Select All, Float, Defloat
"I’m grateful for the support received from my colleagues in the chamber today to be elected as Ceredigion County Council’s new leader – the first Plaid Cymru politician to do so. This moment also heralds a fresh start for Ceredigion with Plaid Cymru at the helm of a new coalition to run the
Innumerable of stains and splendid dyes,
[2] From Wikipedia: “The segaki (“feeding the hungry ghosts”) is a ritual of Japanese Buddhism, traditionally performed to stop the suffering of the gaki, ghosts tormented by insatiable hunger. Alternatively, the ritual forces the gaki to return to their portion of hell or keeps the spirits of the dead from falling into the realm of the gaki. Today, the ceremony also gives participants an opportunity to remember those who have died and to symbolically sever ties with past sins.
The present building was built by Giorgio Massari from 1745 to 1760. The façade was completed during the first years of the 20th Century.
across field and canyon and forest
One of my jobs at work as an Art Educator is to develop art/craft activities for the children.
Rachel Harrie 8:31 PM
by either giving them concrete reason to depend on your ruling structure, (fear)
Though like the childs’
The evil perverted it
So, since I’ve already broken the first resolution, I may as well go on and fill you in on the few details I have regarding a new brewery that is scheduled to open near Beer Rant HQ in the coming weeks. I stumbled across an internet reference to Old World Brewery and while on a beer hunting errand I dropped in to find the place still under construction. Not wanting to make too much of a nuisance of myself I chatted briefly with the installation crew who appeared to be working on the material handling system to bring the ingredients to the brewing vats and then I excused myself. Exiting through the front lobby I bumped into Perry who told me they planned to brew in a couple days and that I should come back then. I thanked him and continued.
So, I've decided to share my enthusiasm with as many people as possible. For the first week in October, I will be releasing fun fall ideas to kick start your inspiration. I hope you will all stop by to see the goodies and share ideas with me!
Genevieve will be attending the show, she really enjoys seeing her favourite TV characters live in concert! Hope to see you all there.
Notes: You can add any nut of choice (walnuts, hazelnuts etc) right after mixing the flour. Just chop them up and fold it in.
This is the first pet of mine that is all my responsibility and I am taking it really seriously, even though its only a fish. I am looking forward to having my goldfish for the next couple years if I succeed! Anyway, I love this cutie. And yes I did just call i fish a cutie…
Authorial Asides: I don't often include book trailers, because they are not all created equally. In this case, the music is by a relative of the author - and I thought it added something.
With a simple story that could fit as a one-or-two episode arc in Natsume Yuujinchou, the short movie Hotarubi no Mori e, based on a one-shot story by Natsume author Yuki Midorikawa, may be brief, but carries its message and sentiment across with charm.
Half-time score: Burridge AFC 1-0 Durley Reserves
Me: Well I know what I’m not missing out on – three extra hours of sleep.
The only tricky part about listening to the gut is discerning what’s the gut and what’s an emotion like fear. Fear exists for similar reasons, it can seem like it’s coming from the same place, but it’s not always founded. Fear generally doesn’t serve me.
*for chocolate cookies add 1/4 c of unsweetened cocoa powder
Debate: Shaun and Ed go out drinking, come back, Shaun resolves to sort his life out, goes around to the store next morning, Ed spots the ‘drunk girl’ in their garden, and they realize that she’s a zombie. Shaun calls around, and realizes that Liz and his mum are both in danger.
Nothing touched me in High School as much as Hesse’s Narcissus and Goldmund. I enjoyed the book at the time without, of course, really understanding it completely. Will I ever? And now, looking back I think I see some similarities in my own life, or better put; my own efforts to find my place.
The South African government last year committed itself to upholding SADC tribunal ruling.
This little bag of jelly beans,
They bring their frantic dancing out among the herd of audience and smash styrofoam boards over our heads, exploding more confetti and glitter, that the techies were probably all too excited to sweep up afterwards, and inviting us to break out and dance with them. They all but turned the theatre into a nightclub!
* Brian Cantwell Smith (Director, Coach House Institute);
may u get better by tomorrow.^^
Bring 3 cups water to a boil in a saucepan and then add the quinoa. Lower the heat, cover, and simmer until the quinoa is tender, 12 to 15 minutes. Drain.
San Japan was pretty effing awesome!
Elf Lair Games
A rag quilt.
Several camera trappers I know periodically post enviable otter photos on the forums.
Sheriff Dante Valtrez would move heaven and earth to keep Marlena safe, but he's not the savior she thinks he is. A dark legacy runs through his blood and a dangerous secret lies within him. Now a fierce, hot, ruthless desire draws Dante and Marlena together--as a demonic force from his past threatens to rip them apart, destroying everything they hold dear.
Be a good example: Saying 'I'm sorry' isn't a weakness - it shows incredible strength. Use good manners. Children learn what they live.
Doesn’t sound like she believes the nonsense that Christians and Jews are people of the book to be treasured, but rather true Islam’s call to kill all Jews and Christians. THIS is the true face of Islam as taught by every imam because this is what the qu’ran teaches, what mohammad taught and that all true muslims believe.
I guess I’ll have to go with Hitchhikers Guide to the Galaxy. I actually saw the movie before I read the books, but when I finally did read the books I realized how much work must have gone into making that story half-understandable for the movie. The books are awesome, but in a way that makes your head want to literally explode, and the movie managed to capture some of that while still being a semi-coherent story. Plus, come on…singing dolphins.
Inspired by the Persian Mughal Art and architecture. The Mesh on the cap is similar to the Mughal style windows.
- Here, in this situation Luke is attempting to convey that the Holy Spirit moved the disciples to desire to pray as Jesus prayed. Do you feel led by the Spirit to have Him bring you to the point where you can pray as Jesus prayed? This desire is the starting point to the Way of Discipleship. If you don’t have it yet, pray for it when you pray the “Disciples Prayer”, not out of routine piety but out of a heartfelt desire and need to follow our Master.
Now, here’s an opportunity – do I grab it or do I kop out? Well in for a penny, in for a pound. Deep breath – here goes: “I run a website interpreting dreams for people”
I'm attempting to show both the back of the skirt and my combat boots. Pose fail! I just wore those boots last Friday, but today they are worn with the top and tongue up. There's a better picture further down, don't worry.
I know, I know - I should go to some fancy schmancy place to get my eyebrows waxed. I also should get my hair dyed by a professional, but somehow - despite the best on intentions - I always end up with a box of dye and crazy Dexter-inspired gloves doing contortion-style moves in my mirror to make sure I don't miss any spots. Sometimes if I have extra cash I'll go to the Brow Bar at Ulta and spend $25. But usually by the time I get a chance to go anywhere I'm starting to resemble Chewbaca and need to go to the nearest salon STAT before my eyebrow hair interferes with my vision. Today was one of those Chewbaca days. And evidently, not just for my eyebrows.
* Speaking of which, some of my favorite animal books are:
The Great Blue Heron (GBH) is the largest of the North American herons.
And now, I'm off to play Kung-Fu.
growth is intentional ..
and choose first one winner and then press vote.
The Grande Villas team are also motivating an engaging our entire staff and guests to get involved with the American Heart Association Start! Movement program.
will be detonated, we are lucky
6:00 AM. Not much sleep, and very little point in trying to sleep now with the rest of the hospital stirring and the sun pouring in. Another day, another night in the hospital.
But, but,but all of these people are great. Notice something else they have in common? They all write (or co-write) their songs.
* sliced boiled potatoes.
So I’ll post this tonight and continue my response tomorrow. See you then!
The same scene, this time precessed differently. A while ago I discovered that if I made a nIR photo of a white balance target and then used that white balance in-camera it produced different looking images to the standard red image from the filter
Outlander series by Diana Gabaldon
I’m not sure – I’m turning over the issue to the experts.
She was very specific that the Tooth Fairy not take her tooth! She left her tooth in a little wooden box I got at a craft store.
I also know that learning is a messy process. When I assemble a portfolio, I spread my papers everywhere and then sort them. When I write a research paper, I make piles of notecards and library books on the kitchen table. Learning is not a neat path that only takes place at a desk. I know this.
I won't know until I make the first step.
By the way, I watched the interview on Guerlain's website and the person who asked Thierry Wasser to make her a new Shalimar wasn't his niece, like other perfume bloggers mentioned, but his goddaughter (that's how it all started). The way he expresses himself is so beautiful. I wished he was my godfather too :(
but un-
Isn't it lovely? I chose a white-on-white tone (with snowflakes!) for my background fabric. I just wanted a bit of continuity throughout my sampler quilt.
Saturday morning in Steenwijk dawned bright and beautiful once again, and before meeting up with Mom, Dad, and Ryan, John and I had a similarly relaxing morning in the countryside to what we’d had the previous day.
Integrated GPS for pedestrian and car navigation
“I think it’s a make or break meeting … and if we won’t see a determined international front against the Iranians or some sort of international effort to persuade the Iranians to step down, I don’t want to be in the shoes of the Israeli prime minister, but he might have to take a tough decision,” Ben-Zion continued.
The daring melee was soon engaged on the deck of the Laughing Rake. A tattooed, maca weilding Cuahto and the fierce marine, Snorri Snorrison were among the first to climb over onboard to face down the harried crimson sashed pirates. Araxo Tydan, growing braver with each encounter, managed to pair off with the wig wearing, foppish Yelloweye Stern, while the daring Cpt. Hammond soon came face to face with Ironclaw; both were surprised to be sure. Tydan ran through and slew Cpt. Stern, his wig and tricorn hat falling away. The pirates looked to Ironclaw for leadership then and just as his cutlass and Vic's met, all around paused in their swordplay to see a third ship rounding the isle to join the fray: their common enemy, the pirate hunting pirvateer Lydia's Light. Hammond and Ironclaw quickly assessed the situation, the Rake was burning and holed beyond repair, and the pirates were bound to lose, but the pirvateers were mainly after the Bird as McGrath knew during his captivity. The two captains swiftly shook on an accord to become temporary allies against the Keoish vessel. Swords were sheathed and cheers rang out as both crews raced to their launches and rowed frantically toward the Keoish carrack while the Bird of Prey thundered cannons to cover their assault.
9. AEIOU Sometimes Y- EBN-OZN
Enjoy the view!
Pre-Chaos was infamous for its crows. People said the sleek black birds began to arrive in the early 2000s, but Sybil, Luna’s aunt, assured her the crows had come at least a decade prior to that. Her aunt also said they were harmless, even protective. “Your victim is right there, Grosso.” Luna slammed a hand against the wall, above the spot where the flesheater had dropped the remains of his meal. “You’re going to ruin the crime scene and lose the criminal, too, if you don’t get on that trail straight away.”
#156 gaining confidence
And yet my superstitions have crept in anyway. For example, I believe it jinxes the writing to talk about it. It puts me off the writing even to have someone ask, "So are you writing today?" And if someone asks me badgeringly about my writing, I can't write at all. If they say, "So what are you writing about? Of course you know what you're writing about. Come on, tell me. You can tell me. I just want to know," I am better off shoveling gravel or cleaning closets.
If they don't make you want to pull your hair out and scream, you're not paying attention. Here we go:
It’s obvious that I can be full of shit at times?
Bonus Material
After a few calls, a "resource" would be "acquired" and the "deliverables" would be on their way to being "ideated."
The garages were done in before they really got started thanks to the Great Depression. The Kents sold the 61st Street garage in 1931, although the building remained as a more conventional parking garage until 1943, when the building was refitted as a warehouse. (It's an apartment building today.)
Last night I was doing some beta reading for Matthew Quinn and got to a stopping point. I looked at my notebook and had an idea. What if, instead of trying to write in prose, I just wrote very basic. Giving myself the details, without worrying even about POV or sentence structure.
The white haired retiree struck up a conversation with the older couple sitting on the outdoor chaise.
Dominik A. Bailey Jr., 43, has been charged with felony removal of human remains after allegedly digging up the cremated man's remains from a Vershire graveyard.
I wanted to drop off some cookies with friends and found I ran out of cards- so I whipped up a few CAS ones to have on hand.
The Prisoner of Zenda (US…John Cromwell, George Cukor, W.S.Van Dyke II)
Justin, your words about our response to the secret and the revealed will of God make some sense of our attitude in this present life, but this is because of our limited perspective and our lack of sanctification. As Reformed theologian John Gerstner says about heaven,” When you go to heaven, you’ll be so sanctified that you’ll be able to look down into hell and see your friend there and rejoice that he’s there.” R.C. Sproul says that in our present unsanctified state our concerns are more in line with those who are in rebellion against God but when we are finally sanctified our desires will be more aligned with the glory of God.
Sprinkle with paprika if desired.
SORRY ON MY FIRST POST I FORGOT TO POST THESE 7 SETS OF JOLEE'S STICKERS!!!(OK, the real scoop is I just found them going through the bags and boxes of blog candy I have set aside. I knew it seemed like I had forgotten something. I was right! HA!) They are from Diane McNeill's Scrapbook Additions Online company. :0)
I didn’t even have to use paragraph breaks, wordpress did them for me!
Despite this, for many years we have witnessed how Ginebra succeeded in proving that they are the real Kings of the hard court. Attest to this is Marlon Aquino’s sweep on court, and Mark Caguioa and Jayjay Helterbrand team-up in rocking the court.
Luckily The Stables does take Visa. If I had known that earlier I may have enjoyed my time there a little more. I'll be honest, I'm not going to go back. For our over 70 readers I highly recommend The Stables, the same way I would recommend Furr's Cafeteria or Bingo at church or the medical marijuana dispensary. If my grandma was still alive and looking for a night on the town, I may point her towards The Stables, who knows maybe Big Shot could have been my new step grandfather.
Audience: the white guy or the other white guy
Now we get to the actual point of his statement, which is really what this guy should have asked, in a nicer tone, from the beginning: "Why didn't they just stop the car while Zoe was on the hood?".
I have to spend the whole day alone in the hotel lounge working but I may decide to call her later for a reunion.
That’s why the blank sheet of paper is such a bad place to start! It’s like going into the British Library without knowing what subject you want to research. Narrowing it down to a title or an author is much more likely to yield success, and the same is true of creative thinking. Even with a precise plan, you may still leave the library with something different from what you intended, but if you go in with no real idea of what you want, you may leave having had a pleasant time but you won’t have anything tangible unless you were tempted to buy something in the gift shop.
I’m afraid to say that the imploded expectations that I was having for this Drama, are now flatted even more. A Truck with twisted story strings and surreal happenings on board rolled over my hopes for a better outcome of Episode two
I tried to embed the video from the subMedia site, but since it's not working from there, I embedded it from YouTube. To see the full video, you'll need to go here.
He sighed and took his glasses off. He trained his eyes on me. He looked deeper.
2 tablespoons chopped Dill
2316 calories
lamb steak and pan-roasted baby potatoes with nettle pesto
It seems that there is a known fault with the Audi TT instrument clusters, in fact there was a class action lawsuit concerning this over in the US!
It is the true tale of how a Ku Klux Klan man who once wrote speeches for the late segregationist Alabama Gov. George Wallace (until he thought Wallace had gone “soft” and sold out to liberals) who then later, as a reinvented “Native American” writer named Forrest Carter, was praised by Oprah Winfrey and others.
28.Slovakia 4
And that was it, and here is the finished result!!!!
After 17 years of marriage and becoming a mother myself I realized I had lost myself somewhere and felt empty from within. Ma constantly encouraged me to find my place in the bigger scheme of things and do justice to my existence on earth. Her attitude toward life inspired me to become what I am today.
Alma taught that there was a two-step process to planting the word, which was the atonement, in one’s heart. You had to create the image of the Son of God in your heart, keeping it there before your sight continually, and you also had to believe in the Son of God. (See Alma 33: 22 above.) All of Christianity understands the part about believing in the Son of God, but we all have misunderstood the part about seeing His image.
2010.08.26 Somalia Mogadishu 14 8 Fourteen Somalis are shredded by two al-Shabaab bomb blasts.
So how on earth do Victoria Bitter, XXXX Bitter, Cascade Pale Ale and Toohey’s New come to be so called? In these instances, the beers started out as ales - bitter ales, pale ales and old ales - and when the lager craze began, the brewers just put the new style into an old bottle. Did they think no one would notice? Did they think the average punter would stop drinking altogether if he couldn’t get a beer called VB? Was the name really that special that they were afraid to let it die?
125. Queen of the Summer Stars: Persia Woolley
After the first assault, the group had just shy of an hour to prepare themselves anew–yet as they now discussed their predicament and exhausted ever more of their healing reserves, mere minutes had passed before shapes began to emerge from the southern front again. Several zombified dwarves shuffled free from the fog, serving as twisted pallbearers for a heavy casket they bore between them; Thane Fenris and the dwarves loosed a sharp cry of outrage at this corruption of their former brethren, immediately charging from the trenches to advance upon their reanimated comrades as the party shouted after them to stop.
However this may be an opportunity to really discuss what people who are or would be members of a social community for teachers, service providers and even some parents/caregivers of individuals with multiple, severe or low incidence disabilities would want in a social community. Most of us who used the Ning used it to ask and answer questions and to share ideas (i.e. how do you manage having too few paras? what does your schedule look like? have you tried XYZ curriculum program?). This could certainly be done on a listserv that comes into our e-mail box, perhaps with more participation. For people who uses the Ning solely for that it sometimes becomes just another site to check on (I am the founder and often feel that way. I have also often wished that Ning forwarded full e-mails to me and allowed me to reply from my e-mail instead of forcing me over to the Ning site to respond.).
You are familiar with the Sierra Club, aren’t you? They have those lovely books and calendars with famed photographer Ansel Adams pictures of Yosemite and the Sierra Nevada Mountains. All the bookstores have them. The Sierra Club was founded as an environmental organization devoted to protecting Yosemite, the Sierras and the Redwoods. Did you know that it has become one of the most radical environmental organizations in the world?
SO, I have been working on this new series of shapes (new for me) and also working with shells and also trying to get this JADE glaze experiment to work, and hot DAWG it has all come together on this VERY item. (photo taken with the camera on the baby top, sorry it is not too clear)
from being beautiful.
“Forget the damn sickies. Forget the afflicted bastards. Save my ass!”
Thanks to a new Atlantic Coast Conference-sponsored program, ACC athletes can give back to kids in the communities that host the conference’s championship tournaments. ACC Community Connections facilitates opportunities for ACC athletes to share life lessons with local elementary and middle school students. Read more here.
Minneapolis Town Hall Brewery Black Snow Coffee Porter
Nestlé introduced one of my favorite candy bars, Crunch, thirty-one years before I was born. This simple twist on their milk chocolate bar in 1938 was a great idea because chocolate was going to be more difficult to get with WWII in the wings and well through the first part of the 1950s. Why did I like this so much when I was growing up? I think I always loved my mother's rice crispy treats especially when she melted in chocolate chips and these remind me of those. 5 3/8th inches long and 2 inches across this looks big is only 0.25 inches thick if you measure the majority of the bar and not the raised edges. This is one of the purer chocolate candy bars in the feature today sugar chocolate, and cocoa butter are the first three ingredients and the list is shorter than many we've seen today. It has a very strong vanilla flavor and the the chocolate is very creamy. While this may have been a favorite of mine in the past, today it just isn't dark enough for me by a long shot but with less ingredients and two products from the cacao bean, it fits in this box.
3) The Mercenaries: Dawn McGill and Svetlana Kovalevski (I) aim for title
One step at a time;
to the President and Congress to do the right thing.
I see the Old Crone walk up behind him, hunched and hooded in the same grey cloak.
Contents
I was traveling in South East Asia after five months of studying in Japan. My mom had joined me, because she was soul-searching and I’d convinced her that the Thai sun would help her out. We were staying on the island of Koh-PhaNgan, and were supposed to leave for Bangkok on the 12th of March, to catch a plane from there to Tokyo on the 15th in order for me to get back to my studies. On the 11th of March, my dad called my mom in a panic, telling us that there had been an earthquake and a subsequent tsunami in Japan. This automatically cancelled our flight to Tokyo, and we debated whether to stay on the island or return to the big city. At this point, I sensed something greater at work, and I was severely depressed. I didn’t care what we did; the fact that I wasn’t going back to Japan seemed like God had put up this enormous hurdle I’d never find a way around. We stayed in Koh-P, and on the 12th, my mom was the one pushing me, her daughter, to go and drink our troubles away at the Half-Moon Party. I was, to put it nicely, not in the mood, but conceded to my mother’s constant nagging.
My inner control freak is, well, freaking out. Huh. So that's what this feels like.
Here is a small sampling of the really great works that my students created. There were so many images it was hard to select which images to feature here on the blog so to see the entire collection please visit my website at nheller.weebly.com and click on the student art gallery or click here to see all of the colorful coils in their glazed glory.
NB I have written about my experiences of living on the residential site of what was The Dell - Southampton FC's former home - in October's issue of When Saturday Comes Magazine, which is available in all good newsagents.
could tell them our intentions
Age: 25 million years
Attahk deepens the Magma mythology, both lyrically and musically, chronicling the further exploits of protagonist Köhntarkösz Köhntarkösz and his battle to leave the Earth and establish a new Utopian society elsewhere in the galaxy. His people, the Kobaïan, are at war with the People of Ork in a nearby galaxy (Ourgon and Gorgo up there are from Ork, apparently), as well as being at odds with the corrupt government of Earth. But it's hard to say, because the whole story is told in the Kobaïan language (which Vander himself invented). But Attakh seems to be mainly concerned with Kobaïan/Ork relations. Or something.
Every card received will be screened for hazardous materials by Pitney Bowes and then reviewed by Red Cross volunteers working around the country.
Chris: Oh now this is just brutal… she just added that if his voice was as big as his dick, that even the world’s greatest microphone couldn’t help him! OUCH again!
Ah yes, “Puberty Love” - music by Paul Sundfor and Gordon Goodwin; lyrics by Costa Dillon, John De Bello and Steve “Rock” Peace.
Run by a very friendly lady boss, this stall serves nothing but oyster cakes, and from the looks of it, they are selling a bunch of these really well.
Leafing-the-Green is a two year writer in residence project focused on The-Green-Townscape-Heritage-Initiative (THI) area of Aberdeen. It is funded by Creative Scotland’s Partners programme and the THI. The project reaches its conclusion in October 2012 and part of the planned legacy is the installation of a plaque trail through the area using the writer’s work.
Speaking of possums, we have words for everything, a family vocabulary that covers an entire notebook of things only we call certain items. Sort of like fo' shizzle, but not. Our latest is road kill. So, a road-kill possum is called a squassum. There are squats and squogs and squnks-but mostly squassums. Chan wants to know what a road-kill squid would be called. Matt said if we hit a squid with the car, we had way more worries than what to call it!
The joy I felt when we transferred the last of our $1,000 into the savings account was amazing. Such a burden lifted off. Making our budget has become a fun time because we can actually put stuff on it besides electricity, water, gas, and food.
folding your napkin & placing it on your chair as you
Seriously. Vent with twelve minutes of swings and suddenly your hangnail is no longer an issue.
In fact, I encountered surprisingly few memorable beers from Deutschschweiz despite its proximity to Germany. The friendly co-owner of the Welschland delicatessen explained that the poor growing conditions for grapes, especially in the cooler Jura canton, paved the way for beer brewing there. It cannot fully explain why all the best craft beers are made in that region.
5. What scares you?
SU Ink- Regal Rose
I mean, risotto with shrimp and scallops is one thing. Topped on a bed of spinach. But finishing it off with a drizzle of truffle oil just makes this dish decadent.
Sugar - 3 teaspoons
I thoroughly enjoyed Blue Asylum and would highly recommend it. Be sure and add it to your summer reading list and do consider it for you next book club pick.
There have been work Xmas parties - three, count them: my unit, our group and the whole institute. And there were musical events - my teacher's studio concert, and the St Phil carols. I've contributed cookies and fruit plates and cakes and pies, and eaten mince pies and old-fashioned white Christmas, and some amazing coconut sticky rice (Maneerat has promised to give me her recipe for that.) The tree is up and the kittens, now small cats, have pulled off the first decorations to roll round the room.
If you don’t believe that beer folk are good folk then I’d suggest you spend a few minutes chatting with Jack Sosebee, whose Del Norte Brewing Company business card reads “Owner/Brewer.” I’d add “Beer Ambassador” to that job title, too. I called him at about 9:00 on a Sunday morning and by 10:30 I was walking into a nondescript warehouse space in a mixed use light industrial/residential area not too far from the University of Denver. Within minutes of my arrival I had a sample of Del Norte’s beer in my hand as we strolled through the compact brewing facility.
If I did, maybe my kids would be asking me to stay off Facebook, too.
played a major role in Adorno’s study of the Authoritarian
The Supreme Court takes up the law Monday to hear arguments on whether it’s constitutional.”
07 Spanish Jungle
It is just a great idea the USDA has come up with. Take a notoriously filthy industry, that is this filthy when they know someone's watching, and stop watching! They'll magically become cleaner, because that's how it works. When you have a lazy employee who doesn't do much when the supervisor is checking up on them, they become a perfect employee if you fire the supervisor and leave them to their own devices...
Briess Pilsner DME 2 lbs. 12.5 oz.
Saturday we went out for lunch at Cici's Pizza and then went by the animal shelter...just to look! I've been asking for a puppy for Christmas ever since our new neighbor puppy found her way into our backyard and spent a couple of afternoons with us until her family got home. There were so many cute animals at the shelter, so we chose a few dogs we were interested in, but as we stood in line, most of the dogs we had chosen were claimed by other folks. There was one left, the one BubTar was really interested in, so we asked to see him. They told us he was "snappish" when he came in and maybe not a good idea with the kids, but another worker said he was VERY sweet and had warmed to him quickly. So we went ahead and asked to visit with him. He was SO pitiful! He just cowered in the middle of the room...no sniffing, no licking, no wagging. Nothing. He just laid still, probably hoping no one would hit him. :( He definitely wasn't aggressive towards us, though. Not a growl or snarl or anything. He was too scared to move, I think. He wasn't available to be adopted yet, since he had only been in the shelter for a day, but we filled out a non-binding application so we would be first in line if we decided to get him. Since we already have a dog, they told us we needed to bring her up so they could meet before we could adopt him, so we made plans to do that on Monday.
I touched a little bit on this topic in The Dungeon Alphabet in my entry for “W is for Weird,” but that intended for fantasy genre. Although the October Country does veer into that terrain, it’s more horror & wonder than sword & sorcery. Time for some new entries of high weirdness and subtle terror. So, with that in mind, here are a dozen little things that would make me pause if my PC came across them during the course of an adventure:
Hope you are all enjoying your summer, I will be back soon,
“I have always admired Lillian Bassman’s work and had the great privilege of spending an afternoon with her last September,” Persson says of the late fashion photographer, who died just last month. “I was so taken by her wit and strength and character and was so sad when I got the news she had passed away. Our interview must have been the last she ever gave.” As for Fonssagrives-Penn, he says, “I wanted to show an amazing side of her that is not so well-known, which is that of an artist. She was an incredibly gifted sculptor and painter; her work is my favorite of any artist.”
Well... I had already announced that a new collaborator would join "The Coffee Shop", well... his name is Brand... We'll be seeing his posts with recipes and tips here and on our FB page so stay tuned so you get to know him too! I know you will like what he shares, he is funny, witty and... well... I'll let his posts speak! For now... I'll just share a picture so you start getting to know him... and you can "put a face with the name" ...
To which the answer is always, yes.
Enjoy this little ditty and know: I haven't forgotten about you or my lovely blog! March has been a CRAZY month. I am still processing and hope to address some of the monumental events in my next post.
Series VI: 447-522
“Pursue love and strive for the spiritual gifts, and especially that you may prophesy. For those who speak in a tongue do not speak to other people but to God; for nobody understands them, since they are speaking mysteries in the Spirit. On the other hand, those who prophesy speak to other people for their up-building and encouragement and consolation.
pen and diagram in his hands, a smoking volcano,
Final Fantasy V 2
Here is a complete line up for the hop in case you get lost along the way. You wont want to miss any of the wonderful projects these talented ladies have made.
Abhisit indeed was able to “Ignite Discontent” as poll after poll says Thais are concerned about high price of goods, particularly food-stuff and energy price.
I don't even know how much (or how little) sleep I got the night before the wedding. I remember seeing Mr. 2SBs text at 2:30ish and was already awake when my alarm went off at 7:30 the next day.
This euro – obsession to maintain a dead currency,or a blood thirsty currency-call it as you want- to keep it alive,makes no sense.I can’t understand the fear of the nations,including the country I live in,if they were left outside the euro.There is an obvious diversity in Europe that makes it impossible for the nations to unite under one currency.The experiment has failed.
The clamour for new disorders to be registered in the latest revision of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual is nothing new: see this post looking at the proposal to enter “Extreme racism“. Some of these proposed classifications are more valid then others and have a greater weight of evidence to support their inclusion. I should point out that I am no Szass inspired anti-psychiatry ideologue but that I do believe there are certain diagnostic categories that are perhaps unnecessary and well covered by others.
Vladimir Putin had sent them. They were to kill Kassidy and takeWilcock to Canada where Eva Moore would transform him into one of her kind, the werekind, the wolf pack.
As we travelled down Hickory Blvd, we slowed down a bit and the temple was on the right and it was a bit difficult to spot the sharp right entrance. For a moment I thought we were being kidnapped by our friend as he took a quick sharp right turn into the Temple Entrance. We might have missed it if we didn’t have enough time to brake. The temple was slightly uphill. As we parked the car and stepped out, we saw a brilliant building with a golden colored pillar in front. The entrance of the temple was as usual from the side and the exit was from the front. I keep wondering why this is so in most temples here in US.
Harry Potter fans around the world have been suffering from Post-Potter Depression ever since the epic conclusion of the 7-novel, 8-film series last July. But though the story has come to an end, magic-lovers everywhere are finding solace in a very unique type of exercise.
Some of the NPCs are actually kinda funny, but they can't make up for the terrible plot.
I saw this house on Traditional Home online and wow....I want to have this life, I want a white Christmas in Connecticut and sit in front of roaring fires and I even want their dogs!!!
Now for the headers,
It is shown that Left-wing activism is often termed 'moralistic' by its opponents. It is suggested that any idea that moral statements could have truth value is delusory and a moralist is defined as one who accepts such a delusion. A scale was devised to detect the extent to which people use moral criteria in deciding on courses of action. This 'moralism' scale showed a reliability of .90. On a group of one hundred technical college students moralism was found to be high in two groups of respondents -- those who were radical on social issues and those who were conservative on issues of sexual morality. In the second study a polarised sample was obtained by student interviewers in a campus-wide study at the University of New South Wales. The issue was attitude to Apartheid. Anti-apartheid demonstrators were found to have lower moralism scores than the non-demonstrators but their moralism scores correlated highly with social desirability. A second study with Sociology I students confirmed this finding and also showed that demonstrators tended to reject intellectually the notion of an objective Right and Wrong. The high correlation with social desirability is interpreted to indicate however that the radical is strongly drawn to moralism even though he rejects it intellectually.
David Thomas Broughton's 2005 debut album The Complete Guide to Insufficiency was a late discovery for me, or else its haunting choral minimalism would surely have ranked among my favorite albums of the 2000s when I compiled my best-of-the-decade list. This year, after a number of EPs and minor releases, Broughton finally returns with a proper follow-up. Outbreeding is a very different record from Broughton's debut, replacing that album's lengthy quasi-improvisations with a series of short, lushly arranged folk-rock tunes, slotting Broughton's mannered vocals and wry wordplay into much fuller arrangements than those found on the sparse Complete Guide. There's an arch, aloof quality to Broughton's carefully enunciated intonations, and he takes clear delight in drawing out certain syllables, rolling his R's and stretching vowels into eccentric shapes. He clearly loves saying "fuck" so much that it comes out like "fook;" he savors the shapes of words until they're stretched out of joint. This quirky vocal style draws attention to the subtle cleverness of the lyrics, like the sprightly punning of "Ain't Got No Sole" or the tongue-twisting eloquence of these lines from "Staying True": "my body is so crap at staying true/ to my will and the way I'd like to be/ my father's fist is a brick in my heart." Broughton has refrained from simply repeating himself. With a bonafide masterpiece of droning minimalist folk under his belt he now turns his attention to wry pub pop, the obvious irony in his tone not disguising the equally obvious emotion underpinning his elliptical musings. [buy]
Libba Bray’s directive to ask yourself “Is it true yet?” always sits on my shoulder as I revise.
1) Prepare and grease a 7 inch round pan. Preheat oven to 170 degrees.C.
Sun sparkling on water. Weird light cast on walls and through windows in the house, on plants, through the bay window. An eastern amberwing skimming the surface of the lake down the hill, where I’m still, before swimming on. Swimming into the V of a setting sun in any kind of water. Making jewelry for friends and giving each piece a poetry name.
And a bathroom whose tub crouched on lion’s feet,
Kimble Monroe has chosen to live in the territory. He was born here, and he is extraordinarily well adapted to it. He’s one in a million. Maybe one in a billion. In 7th Sigma, Gould builds an extraordinary SF novel of survival and personal triumph against all the odds.
Sometimes what we call luck is about being noticed. People who are too pushy can be really irritating and that makes others not want to choose them or do good things for them. These over-pushy people can sometimes be really successful at first, but they fall hard and painfully when people cotton on to the fact that their heads and mouths are bigger than their talent. But not being pushy enough means you don't get noticed. A lot of the whole art of "getting on" in life is about treading the line between being too pushy and not pushy enough.
We simply can’t have this type of unruly behavior on one of Washington D.C‘s grandest traditions- politicos hobnobbing with and showcasing rich elite celebrities and other people with overly inflated visions of self importance.
It’s like, honestly, people? Guys, you should be more ashamed of your browser histories than of your bodily functions. Guess which one’s been around longer? And guess which one’s normal?
Being “drunk” with the Holy Spirit also can remove inhibitions. It just removes different inhibitions. When we are drunk with the Spirit we can be released from our flesh and sin nature. Think about how fear often rules our life when we think about expressing and living our faith. Being filled with the Spirit should release us from the power of that fear and give us full and total confidence in our God. God’s goal and plan for each of our lives is to make us more like Himself and He does that through His Holy Spirit.
Lying deep within the heart’s flanks
The mission of the Order put the lives of the Trinitarians at great risk. Many suffered death in their vocation
Below is the challenge pad.....
I guess I'm really tired of the suggestion that an exercise in pen and paper will alleviate my suffering. How could something so deep be so easily assuaged? And how in the world do I manage?
Now I lie next to my beloved hoping that the butterfly will gently alight on the colorful wild flowers growing upon our graves.
Or....
Offering up sugar is an excellent hint for excess weight loss. Slicing all food items that have added sugar from your diet plan should be attainable. Food items that include only all-natural sugar include fruits and particular vegetables.
Anyway, enough of the boring stuff. Did I mention that I've been taking hip hop classes? That's right, I'm hardcore. Jake's been taking them with me. It's been a lot of fun. We have our concert coming up the first week of December, I'm excited for it! I'll have to try to post a video when it's all said and done so you can all laugh at me trying to be gangster. ; )
What if you had to individually negotiate, as a household, with a toll road operator, for your toll road rates? The toll road operator could consider your address and decide just how much it might be able to wring out of you based on what it guesses is your individual likelihood to be willing to pay more.
2T soy sauce
Well… This one just happens to be fog and drizzle. The temperature isn’t too bad really, but the constant drizzle soaks you slowly to the bones, making any semblance of comfort a thing of the past.
"Excellent! The course was very useful and exceeded my expectations." Amy Dalguish, Travel Editor, Total Travel
If you want to know how to wait on God, then take John Waller’s song to heart.
1/2 teaspoon brandy or cognac
Girl: Really?
HAPPY BIRTHDAY TESSA XXXX
Flashes afresh to hold and horrify.
I concede that Mali is an ambiguous case, whatever your precise definition of democracy. Still, the surprise many people are expressing about the coup makes me wonder about the consequences of our lowered expectations for democratization in poor countries, and perhaps for Africa in particular. For logistical reasons alone, it’s really hard to hold fair elections. And, as anyone who’s spent any time watching politics can tell you, the logistical challenges are only part of the problem; people everywhere will also do all sorts of things in search of an edge. When we see this stuff in rich countries, we call it a crime. When we see it in poor countries, though, we’re more likely to excuse it as growing pains or technical difficulties.
Okay…so I’m doing it, I’m going all out and jumping into the blogosphere. I’ve dabbled with blogging a couple times but never really put any thought into doing this thing full fledge. I suppose to begin I should introduce myself. My name is Melissa. I’m about 25 days shy of being a college graduate. I’m 21. I’m half brazilian/caucasian just to get that one out of the way. I am a Jesus Follower, graphic designer, avid Instagrammer and advertising fiend. I guess that covers the basics.
Pretty deep, huh? Well, I guess that would be all from me, so if you didn’t see this movie yet, you have to go see it. It really is an engaging experience that will set your brain cells boiling to figure out who is who, while admiring the chemistry between the two main actors and the priceless dialogue in between. Also, take the time to admire the memorable opening titles. Mesmerizing.
Troy is such an interesting character and I think he'll definitely create a lot of discussion. He's genuinely unsettling in places and, even though he freaked me out, I thought he was a great addition to the story. Some of my favourite scenes were between him and Delaney, particularly as the novel drew to a close. Sorry, I know that's a little vague but I don't want to give away any spoilers.
That's about all I have for today. Lots of work going on around here,
We sure do love our families and friends! We miss every last one of you. We're so grateful that we've been able to keep close with so many and hear from so many of you. You don't know how much it means to us to just hear from you on Facebook or get a text. It's a pretty lonely time for us right now and we just really appreciate your love and for thinking of us.
Friends, Romans and countrymen...
What is OSSAS?
And I need to kick my starbucks habit... two a week or more is just not good for the pocket!
That’s right, on March 17th at 11pm it’s time to get the sketch and improv comedy shot that you’ll need to get over the green beer hangover that will be kicking in on Sunday morning.
This post is intended to be a playful jibe, humorous and I know that I've definitely pushed my saturation slider too far to the right (and left) in the past LOL.
“Do I get a vote?” Aisha cut in, before he could respond.
So. Then I started wandering with a guy alum friend (who doesn’t get a name because the odds of him getting mentioned again are slim… we aren’t that close) to his old dorm because I had nothing better to do till blues started and when he heard Ai had broken up with me and I was still stupid-in-love with him, he wanted to show me something.
Similarly, as we debate the marginalization of the middle class and the extreme wealth of the top 1%, I can’t help but think there are a few people who wouldn’t mind a society where class is predetermined and non-controversial. At one point, the Controller (leader) says to the Savage (a non-civilized person, brought into the civilized world, whose experiences there are the focal point of the novel), “‘The optimum population is modeled on the iceberg—eight-ninths below the water line, one-ninth above.’ ” Sounds mighty familiar.
Grease a 13 by 9 by 2-inch pan and set aside. In a mixing bowl, stir together flour, sugar, and salt. Add butter, eggs, orange extract, and orange zest and beat with a handheld electric mixer until well blended. Pour batter into prepared pan and bake for 30 minutes, or until light golden brown and set. Remove from oven and pierce top of entire cake with a fork.
I have said it before, and I'm sure I'll say it again, but I am a meat and potatoes kind of girl. I had bought some cube steak at the market this weekend, and made this recipe. I was pretty disappointed in the outcome to say the least. So when I realized I had about twice the amount I actually needed for that recipe, I knew I would have to try something else this week with the remainder. I decided to go with a classic cube steak recipe, however when I was searching around the Internet, I was consistently missing one key ingredient from each one. So, I decided to make up my own thing.
current rules. If irrelevant information is filtered out before an IDS is filed,
My dad would be driving and we would get near the stoplight where we would have to choose which direction to go, dad would ask, “Which way do you want to go?” Generally my sibling or I would reply, “It’s a horse a piece.”
While the offense looked a bit out of sorts at times, it’s hard to argue with gaining over 200 yards rushing as well as throwing for over 250 more. And I know a lot of folks will point to the second half and say that we took our foot the gas and let the Rebels stay in the game. But it seems to me that we were holding them defensively pretty consistently and it’s possible that we started thinking about our next game and how much more of our offense we wanted to show Dan Mullen. And, really, had it not been for the three missed field goals, 36-13 would have been the final score. While that may look nicer, the fact is 27-13 is, in the end, just as good.
see what we can see
Hope you all are having a wonderful spring.
NOTE: If it wasn’t sooooo DANG cold I may have just rolled with that, but it was REALLY cold outside.
The Commission on Judicial Conduct should ignore Judge Berchelmann's punishment recommendation and reprimand Judge Keller, but not recommend removing her, based on these findings of fact. Berchelmann is wrong: Keller did violate the court's unwritten rules. And Keller brought any "public humiliation" on herself. But her technical distinctions between the court and the clerk's office (at one point Berchelmann basically calls her a liar, saying no "reasonable person" would say she'd close the clerk's office again under the same circumstances) probably obfuscate the legal question enough to conclude removal isn't justified, even if "there is a valid reason why many in the legal community are not proud of Judge Keller's actions."
One of the effects of the phenomenal growth of ebooks over the past few years has been to bring new value to the backlist--both for publishers who hold the contracts for backlist books, and authors who want the freedom to exploit a new range of rights. Since many of the most valuable backlist books were published long before ebooks existed, the issue of who controls electronic rights is a pressing one, for authors and publishers alike. Is it the authors, who granted only print rights at a time when print rights were all there were? Or is it the publishers, which bought the exclusive right to publish a book, regardless of the form in which that book appears?
To leave you with one last thing before we go…
Hope you will find some time to join in this week's challenge. There are some lovely prizes waiting for you, who knows, you may be the lucky winner:)
7. Write a letter to a poet.
"See" you in a bit over a week!
You can’t really know a city until you have walked its streets, particularly its residential areas. One of the perksof street level exploration of a city (other than noticing the infrastructure) is finding little gems. One of the things that gives Redlands its character is its history in agriculture, not just being the Washington Navel Orange capital of the world, but appreciating the still-large amount of active agriculture. In addition to active agriculture, there are backyard remnants of groves and other fruit trees. If you drive around Redlands, you can find many front yard fruit stands. You can find a story on this phenomenon in the Press-Enterprise article published on March 5, 2010 titled “Citrus Sales are part of the tradition of Redlands, nothing beats fresh” by Jan Sears and Darrell R. Santschi. As of the writing of this post, it is available online. I am not going to link to it because newspaper links break very easily.
honey lips steel good men away
One of Par-Chavorlem’s plans to cover up why he has an army a lot larger than it should be is the threat of the rebels. Against the charter he brings in members of another biped race from another planet to make it look like the problem is bigger than it is. It works as the rebels and the other biped race go to war with each other.
but don't write that
Forgive a young and boastful man
“The high priest said to Him, ‘I charge You under oath by the living God: Tell us if You are the Christ, the Son of God.’
At the end of the tour, Nipper said they were standing in the small courtyard between the classrooms and the modular buildings that make up the school. Oh...yeah...where do you think we are, New England? For $16k, you get a smaller class size, maybe p.e., perhaps art of foreign language, in a school that is usually located in an abandoned public school, or worse an old office building. "But OH LOOK AT OUR PHILOSOPHY!" So they are standing around talking, and the 5th and 6th graders are having their "recess" in this squalid courtyard. One of the parents on the tour asked the director what is their "conflict resolution system"? The dingy director prevaricated briefly, which is shocking, because these things are usually so ingrained in their spiel, it's like they are DYING for you to ask. Then said, they didn't really have one (gasp), as their kids are really good kids, and they don't have incidents often enough to warrant a whole system.
5.Fry the tempering ingredients and mix.
12”
The needle had scarcely made its last stitch when the girl looked through the window and saw the white feathers on the prince's hat. The spindle had brought him here with its golden thread. He dismounted and walked across the carpet into the house. When he stepped into the kitchen she was standing there in her simple dress, but she was glowing in it like a rose in a bush.
My mother, Juliana, was a wonderful person, and you would expect me to say that, but I dare anyone to prove me wrong. She was blessed with a spectacular operatic voice, one of such wonder and beauty that she appeared as a child on local radio shows, and had a chance at a contract with the CBS Radio Network.
Carried Orders Since before end of day 01/31/2012, still outstanding as of end of day 02/29/2012
Using the right hair products, however, is the most essential. Like I mentioned above, wrong hair products can cause irritation on scalp skin and cause dandruff. Hair care products I think is my favorite remedy. A few weeks ago I shared an article on Clear shampoo, I keep going back to their facebook page (http://www.facebook.com/clear) and I have attached a recent picture I found on it, calling the scalp flaky land was funny, but that is exactly what I feel every winter season, my head is flaky land for sure. I shampoo every alternate day, it helps keep the moisture in my hair and at the same time keeps my scalp clean and dandruff free.
Bride bikini is now offering sale items! Check our the website and click on the sales item tab. You will then find all the items we are featuring on sale. Items are brand new and can still be customized with your favorite rhinestone saying. Currently we have a Small Orange Bikini set, Small Tan Bikini Set, and a White Bride Tank Top. They won’t last long! So check them out now!
I know what I need to do, in fact I have written it all down and have a recipe book to pull from ever meal that I need to create, cook and eat so that my body is fueled correctly. I know how to workout and in fact I crave it but with my current stress levels and lack of what I would call free time to get out there and bust ass, I am as I stated struggling to get back in the game as it were. Am I still riding my bike? Absofuckinloutly! that is something that I won't stop doing as its one of the things in life where I find pure joy but I am not in fact riding enough. I haven't ridden during the week in months, My only riding takes place on the weekend with a riding buddy and that's approximately 20 to 25 miles at a go which is as I said not enough.
But I named my dearest friend “Rabbit” because he reminded me of a brown rabbit dancing in the meadow in the spring.
DW: I think if I was not a hockey player, I would be a farmer. I spend a lot of time on my girlfriend’s farm and I like the lifestyle. I’m more of a laid back, simple life kind of guy.
2 cups finely diced carrots
I've already printed it and plan on going out to my stash of frames tomorrow to find one to display it in. Of all the decorations I want placed in my home for this precious holiday, I want them to be meaningful, and there's nothing more meaningful than the reminder of why Christ went to the cross for us.
But enough of that- I wanted to get my package entry in for the monthly circle contact.
A: That s not at issue here. The specificat ion doesn t indicate breadth. That s the purpose
‘‘(3) SECURITY CLEARANCE APPROVALS.—The Director of National Intelligence shall issue guidelines providing that the head of an element of the intelligence community may, as the head of such element considers necessary to carry out this subsection—
Today its snowing. He watches as we approach. With
We're off to see Wim Wenders' Pina this evening, should all go as planned, and then tomorrow we have tickets to The Barber of Seville. Hope you're up to something fun this weekend or, at the very least, have some lovely restorative quiet time.
-Witnessing the dedication of the walkers
145 “What The Clearing Means To Me.” Siftings From The Clearing, Ellison Bay, Wisconsin, June 1976, p. 1.
…because some of us just can’t get it right.
2. The process for submitting items to the school board for agenda inclusion was flawed even before the 10 day advance was proposed. Other than submitting her or his own agenda requests, the superintendent should have no say in what the board does or does not discuss. There is simply no justification for giving the Superintendent the authority to approve or disapprove such requests from the public. Though Hibbard seems set on acting otherwise, the elected board is the superintendent's boss and not the other way around. The school board exists to protect the public's interests, not the superintendent's. As such, agenda items should be submitted to the full board for their inclusive consideration, not to the superintendent. If the board wants to change the rules, they should start there.
Cherries
If you had the chance of cooking anything for Michel Roux Jr, would you choose cheap and unlovely to look at but apparently delicious Coley, or would you pick Halibut – the king of the seas with the price tag to match? Well, you might have noticed that Masterchef contestants rarely go for the cheap cuts and (with the exception of a few episodes where they drifted down to Borough Market to sniff cheese) there’s very little focus on sourcing ingredients…this makes me worry about the profitability of the restaurants they’re going to open when they’ve won.
It is flourishing in other parts of the world as well.
Reminder: Candlewick Press offers free downloads of two of my short stories ("Haunted Love" and "Cat Calls") from all major e-retailers. Any other "free" downloads of my work are illegal copyright infringements, which (besides stealing) reduce the odds of my publishing future books.
This one is taken from Soompi when Joo Won joined the SM’s The Ballad MV (this was also posted at Thundie’s):
sorry
I mentioned that we were going to have dinner at the Dillard House in Dillard, Georgia. The Dillard House serves their meals family style — they bring the food to your table and you help yourself to what you would like. Betsy and I were able to get a table for two by the window. The table was very nice and we thought it was very roomy — until our server brought the food. As you can see from the picture above, the table suddenly became quite crowded. And dessert had yet to come!
Just thirty nine years later Our Lady herself from Guadalupe converted millions in New Spain to faith in Jesus Christ. There were countless tireless and very effective Spanish missionaries in the first century of the evangelization of America, including the Apostle of South America. It is no accident that the patroness of USA, therefore, is The Immaculate Conception. She was brought here on Columbus Day!
Author: James Blakely
“That’s a silly attitude!” he tells her.
Stamps: August KOM - Unity Stamp Co
Skirt: thrifted, probably ten years ago.
Yep, one day until kindergarten. Well, it's one night now. We tried on clothes for tomorrow. I held it together (sort of). We talked about how he needs to listen to his teacher and do his schoolwork. I held it together (sort of). We talked about how excited he is to meet new friends. I held it together (sort of). We talked about riding the KinderCare bus back to me at the end of the day. I held it together (hanging by a string here). I gave him a kiss goodnight and tucked him in. This is where I lost it.
(3) For the purpose of this Article the term "forced or compulsory labour" shall not include: (a) any work required to be done in the ordinary course of detention imposed in accordance to the provisions of Article 5 of this Convention or during conditional release from such detention;(b) any service of a military character or, in the case of conscientious objectors in countries where they are recognised, service exacted instead of compulsory military service;(c) any service exacted in case of an emergency or calamity threatening the life or well-being of the community;(d) any work or service which forms part of normal civic obligations.
His antic style tests the reader: a little silliness goes a long way, but Gough explores what happens if you carry on regardless, and often makes it out the other side. For many – sometimes for me – the book will be read in a condition of perpetual frustration at its seeming aimlessness, its constant threatening to disappear into chaos. But the chaos of real life replicated in the page might after all be a welcome change from the artificial order of so much contemporary literature. And once or twice, Gough shows that his reach extends beyond the comic. One otherwise predictable scene where Jude, at a Turner Prize exhibition, innocently ‘tidies up’ a series of famous artworks (and, more predictably still, earns the approbation of art critics in doing so), ends with a two-page passage where Jude contemplates Damien Hirst’s installation A Thousand Years with a straight face. It’s respectful, affecting and impressive, and one of the only moments where the book becomes serious at the level of character as well as ideas. In a blizzard of serious points made in silly ways, a serious point made in a serious way comes like a punch in the gut to the reader. More peace and pathos like this would have been welcome.
Our school does this awesome thing every year called Shark Attack. It works like this: all the people who sign up are assigned a random number. You receive a shark with your number on it. You receive only the name of the person with the shark one number above yours and your mission is to find that person and squirt them with your water-loaded shark. Once you get your target, they hand over their shark(s) and the name of their target, who is now your new target.
The thought of you makes me want you
Equals 35 years down with a lot of living and loving to go!
Shifting gears, a brand new key
Has anyone rocked the peplum yet?!
I wonder if the things I say have any influence on these kids. I hope so. My goal is to influence them away from certain pitfalls in life and toward the good stuff. My input is subtle and not of the lecture variety. Mostly by example when situations arise.
Grandma gave us our allowance today.
Oh, and surveilling shady characters.
“Now where did I put that d****d scalpel?” He muttered.
Right inside
Hey Moms!
There are three...count them 3!!!...quilt shops in Anchorage. Be still my beating heart, I could spend all day in those shops.
Venus’s astronomical cycles are legendary.
“House and Senate Appropriators this week ignored the wishes of D.C.’s mayor, D.C.’s public schools chancellor, a majority of D.C.’s city council, and more than 70 percent of D.C. residents and have mandated the slow death of the D.C. Opportunity Scholarship Program. This successful school voucher program–for D.C.’s poorest families–has allowed more than 3,300 children to attend the best schools they have ever known.
So just remember boys and girls
What it’s not legitimate for a minister to do is to start (or give the impression of starting) a personal vendetta against a particular individual or organisation. That’s why Jeremy Hunt won’t openly put the boot into the BBC per se, but will instead call for “financial responsibility” (i.e. cutting the licence fee) and “freeing up the market” (i.e. giving BSkyB free rein). And that’s why Cable was stupid and vain for expressing his agenda in personal terms, and has set back the anti-Murdoch cause irrevocably by doing so.
Carol Billups
I’ve always loved video games, but not enough to strap a headset to my face and interect with other nerds across the country while pretending we’re virtual army assasins with more firepower than the entire United States military put together. I don’t have that kind of time. I’ll play Donkey Kong every now and again or a little drunken Guitar Hero with friends, sometimes I even get crazy and play some Wii Tennis, but that’s it.
Cartridge cases are generally marked on their case heads, with the manufacturer of the case, and the chambering the case is designed for. This is called the "headstamp".
“Invest in this new generation of veterans,” Rieckhoff says. “It’ll be the best dollar you’ve ever spent.”
They made it very clear to them that they are not going to be able to initiate some kind of nuclear holocaust and be able to get away with it.
This above quote by Margaret Mead has always been an important one in my life...and it resonates today as much as it did in my past social service days. During the time I was a community development worker, social worker and coordinator, which I did for 16 years before following my heart and dreams to become a full time artist and facilitator, I found that the best and most successful projects and programs were always the ones where the group worked as a unit without one clear leader.. In fact we were all leaders, each one of us brought our gifts and leadership to the task at hand....
Why take it out on Paul? He seemed to be the cause of the tumult; or if not he would certainly know what it was all about.
Bookwork is calling..........
Everybody is out on jobs so I'm alone in the police station, sitting in the back office behind the front desk. Their is a CCTV monitor screen on the wall above me showing a downward angle view of the front counter so I can see if anyone comes in and go to see what they want. The image on the screen may as well be a photograph as nothing has moved on the picture for the last two hours.
His early movie roles — there were more than 100 in all — were more varied, playing good guys and bad guys, and sidekicks to everyone from James Stewart to Henry Fonda (in 1943's The Ox-Bow Incident, one of Morgan's best film roles).
Pearl sitting in her temporary home away from home puts her at almost 6 inches. If you have been visiting then you know all about her glass base. If this is your first time just wander back a bit and you can read all about it. Keep wandering around and you will find all kinds of whimsical characters that live here under the old Southern Ooaks tree.
To anyone who is completely themselves around anyone and everyone: I respect you more than you will ever know. I try my very best to be myself at all times, but sometimes I shy away and crawl back into my shell, hiding from the true me and hiding from the truth in general.
"There is no doubt in my mind that the four men - who each had R1 000 on them when they were arrested - were paid to kill me."
4 t sesame oil
Though ebooks is changing that, allowing books to remain available well beyond a print life – that is part of the optimistic view. Add affordable Print-on-demand, into the mix – and it’s the best of both worlds.
Make note of each above effected area — watch for up to 72 hours. Normally we’ve been seeing each ring/square epicenter receive Damaging winds, hail, and possible tornadoes within 3 days of the point of the frequency flash occurring.
Last spring, we bought a neat little native wildflower from Wilcox Nursery over in Largo. We were intrigued by the yummy minty smell at the time, and the promise of hordes of tiny flowers in the fall. Well, fall has arrived, and the Georgia Calamint (Calamintha georgiana) has delivered the promised buds and blooms, the sheer number of which are hard to appreciate in this photograph.
I think it's because flowers have no one to hold,
6. C.P. JEEBIES (4:40)
Many of you have just participated in meditation and other forms of acknowledgement concerning the Summer Solstice. It has been heart-warming for us to see your response, and it is a measure of how seriously you take your responsibilities as Lightworkers. These occasions are more meaningful when you join in, and the result is that the level of Light on Earth is lifted up yet again. You are forcing the dark Ones to withdraw and cease their pointless efforts to stop progress. They remain a nuisance and we are stepping up our plan to remove them. We treat them with love and understanding as we do not judge or condemn, as that would not be helpful if they are to be converted to the Light once again. Love alone is the great power that cannot be repelled and will soften the hardest hearts. Our wish is to see every human soul rise up, even if they are unable to achieve it this time around. No soul is discarded or damned forever, and will at some stage return to the Source as a Godspark.
2) CBI Best-of-Three Finals: Pittsburgh Panthers v. Washington State Cougars
Postscript: I’ve just read this great piece by John Pilger, The kidnapping of Haiti. I mentioned the BBC’s Matt Frei a few days ago. He’d called for a fullscale US invasion and occupation as the only “hope” for Haiti. Here’s Pilger’s assessment:
Chief among them being the place of Sanya Richards Ross (USA) among the 400 meter hierarchy. As recently as earlier this week when I put the 400 meter poll up on this site, Sanya was no where near being considered a factor for Daegu – I almost didn’t put her name on the poll. Today, however, after covering 400 meters of real estate in 49.66 sec (the #2 time this year) she is suddenly smack dab back in the middle of the conversation! Richards Ross ran a vintage type race for her – out fast; strong around the second turn; and holding off challengers down the finishing stretch. He closest pursuer was Jamaican Rosemarie Whyte who ran a PR 49.84 by running a similar race pattern to Richards Ross, though not quite so fast through the first half of the race. Suddenly, within the last couple of weeks, the women’s 400 has gotten a bit crowded. And what looked perhaps to be the easiest part of the 200/400 double for Allyson Felix may now be the hardest part. More when I begin to look at event previews.
Man at the pub who "let a loud one loose".
The bullies might have said awful things to you and made you question your worth. Perhaps you’re avoiding furthering your education or pushing your career onward because of the things they made you believe about yourself. Try to focus on the real picture. Think about your abilities and the things you do well. Think about your interests, hobbies and passions, and pursue them. The bullies didn’t know you. Nothing they said was worth listening to. There’s no reason why you can’t do the things you’d like to do with your life.
Fancy making a mini project? Then join in and create something smaller then 12x12 with something black on and you could be a winner of this gorgeous kit, just link your project's blog post using the link tool below.
This went on for some time.
Now for the good parts - all I have to do is wash it (which I would do regardless), toss it into a box (therefore, no need to go back to pick up my container) and drop it off. They do EVERYTHING else. They will sort though the stuff, keep what will work and either have me come pick up the items that won't work or they will donate it to the homeless mission here and they also take care of the tagging and pricing and marketing of the items. If there are certain items that I want to have back, then they will make sure I get them back if they either choose not to sell the item or if the item does not sell within 120 days. It's a very cool deal. Right now, they are taking clothes for spring/summer and in three months, they will be taking fall/winter clothes as well. And if I take clothes in as late as day 119 from the first date of consignment, then I will have 120 days from day 119 to have the items sell as well for no extra charge. I hope that makes sense. LOL!
Dinner is ordered by 4pm so chef can tailor your meal specifically to your liking. The menu changes with the seasons and is surprisingly well priced. Three courses for $70 or you can choose directly off the priced menu if you don’t want to indulge in all three courses.
Merlyn's Raven by Rose Vanden Eynden
Then, he began mailing collages to friends and strangers, arranging the first informal happenings. He met and made friends with Andy Warhol, participated in performance art events (1957-1963), staging events, which he called "Nothings."
Donnelly also had noted that regardless of a sale of assets, Cessna, Embraer and other competitors likely will pick up a little market share as a result of Hawker Beechcraft’s financial woes.
Just let me out
Tiffany
Originally from the U.K. , Grant moved to the Oakland Bay Area to study art, earning a degree in Industrial Design from San Francisco State University.
There was also a big shoal of pollock at about 8 meters. I think this particular shoal was the reason so many seals were around.
I had never seen a thousand dollar bill before and I don't think- looking at the child-like wonder in my father's face- that he had either.
devil away from me; don’t let the devil trouble me anymore.” But as you grew in
Amanpour: Today we debate the defining
So who are Lorillard???
“Wow,” I responded, “you don’t waste any time, do you? Usually I get a free drink before I have to answer that question.”
Rice Flour, ½ cup
I took Trout with me up to Chattanooga last Saturday to check out the market they have set up along the Tennessee River to see if I want to participate. I don't. Its way too hard. I was a little worried about taking Trout because she doesn't like little children - and by that i mean three feet tall or less - and she can also get aggressive towards other dogs when she is on a leash. V and I decided to split the dogs up for a while because their pack behavior was bad on Halloween night -they rushed the door anytime someone knocked and we couldnt make them get off or sit or do anything. So I took Trout and he kept Koby and we are working on having them stay seated when the door opens and waiting for a command to go through the door.
If, after asking these questions, it becomes apparent that a writer has little experience with editors and would have a difficult time absorbing trenchant suggestions, an editor needs to use a light hand. In my experience, such a situation demands that we ask questions, not show the way.
We would love pictures of you in your green! You can email them to lindsayjmarkert@hotmail.com.
Two women meet at a playground, where their children are swinging and playing ball. The women are sitting on a bench watching. Eventually, they begin to talk. ...
You may realize that I’m preaching to myself here. The adjustment-making I do on the bathroom scales has a humorous element (I smile while I’m doing it), but I can see that it isn’t moving me toward facing the unpleasant challenges created by my real-true gap. If you have a real-true gap somewhere in your life (and I’m guessing almost all of us do, somewhere, to some extent), I can sympathize. Let me offer you the same tough love I’m trying to offer myself: an absence of judgment and criticism combined with a presence of warm and confident encouragement: You can do this. Stay with the real, stop doing the stupidest things, and get help where you need it.
This ambiguity is found here in Psalm 22 as well. In verse 26 it is the afflicted who seek the Lord who will “eat and be satisfied.” This is a “reversal of fortunes,” the afflicted ones will be lifted out of their troubles, they will no longer fear the oppressors. In verse 29, however, the “prosperous of the earth” will eat and worship as they bow down to the dust. This may be a reference to a future judgment of the nations at the beginning of the messianic age.
– San Diego Jails to House State Inmates: “Very Scary Prospect”
So yeah, I like to think back every now and then and just enjoy what I'm doing, what I've done and where I'm headed. And where I am headed at this point is towards a lot of training. I'm still putting some finishing touches on my long term training and racing plans but all of that shall be decided in the next day or so and then I can get to work!
To my way of thinking, the ideal stocking should have a little of everything; some toys, some candy, one or two practical things you'd never think to buy yourself... in my experience trying a "theme" stocking just ends in misery, heartache, and too many loose pistachio nuts (this may or may not have happened to me once).
What if we are unwilling or unable to love others or open up to the power of love to heal? When we use man as the standard by which we understand and apply love, then we will continue to be unwilling and unable. On the other hand, if we seek to please God and use His standard, then our unwillingness and inability will soon gravitate toward willingness and able to do so; how can it not?
Seriously folks don't get a wristband unless you are a 100% lover of music and know what SXSW is all about. I'm really shitting my pants that I won't get a wristband for the first time since the early 90's. I can't break my 12 year streak of never missing a night of SXSW! Please don't sign up in the random drawing!
Stamps: Our Daily Bread Designs Peace & Joy
Of course, these terrific resources won’t be tapped unless people first “know their numbers” and appreciate their own risk, says cardiologist and hypertension clinic director Dr. John Bisognano. Below, we asked him to debunk some deep-seated myths surrounding high blood pressure.
-Vogue, June 2009 issue. Jeffrey Steingarten has a fantastic feature on the stuff. Read an excerpt here.
I press my lips into my mouth to stop myself from answering. My mother already knows that I don’t want a slave. Many girls on the satellite receive a male slave for their sixteenth birthday. Owning a slave of opposite gender is supposed to be a symbol of entering adulthood – a birthday present for society’s debutantes. My mother claims that she wants me to follow tradition, but really, buying a slave is only an opportunity for her to prove that a person such as me can afford to own another human being. She doesn’t want anyone to think otherwise.
Jo! Jo! Jo! The master rapscallion’s carefully crafted, wicked scheme seems to have had the unintended outcome, and perhaps, this is the turning point in Jin Haeng and Soo Hyun’s relationship, professional or otherwise …
One nightsgritch - a tooth collecting evening – Aggie is attacked by a bright, mysterious light. Is is a low flying glow-worm or something more sinister? Unknown to them, Aggie and her gang have just thirty days to save their kind, but time is not on their side … neither are the sprites or the Grublins.
I've never had a gel manicure, and can't see myself getting one anytime soon. I paint my nails so frequently, I'd be heartbroken to not be able to change my polish daily if I'd like! I've considered getting a gel manicure for vacations, wedding weekends, etc. but then I remembered that I pack nail polish tools and paints everywhere I go. It's just as important as underwear for me!
I would highly recommend that you check out Tea and all that they have to offer. i am a big fan of the quality and variety, and I'm sure you'll find something you love!
In the 1960s the New Left took over Liberalism but changed the content. For example, and this is profoundly important, individual rights became group rights. This shifted it to totalitarian thinking as group rights gave minority groups (victims) preferential treatment over the host population (oppressors).
Product- Breville Juicer, Droid X phone
The second reason I enjoyed this read was because of the prefaces to each story. At the beginning of each short, there is a paragraph or two about what the story is about, and what Poe was doing in his life at the time.
Gallery owners Michael Foley and Sasha Wolf are thrilled to announce the formation of The Exhibition Lab, a new study center for fine art photography.
Doing this manually in the UI tool was in fact too error-prone, too boring. As a java/groovy developper, I should automate this with a groovy script.
And yet don’t look too good, nor talk too wise;
3m caesarstone island to this!
So then, the question begs… Just when are the supposed conservatives, who are begging for our votes, going to stop the circular political sideshow and go after Obama… calling him what he is… a failed president and an energy charlatan of historical proportions?
Looking at my life now, as a 25-year-old man, or better yet a twenty-something, I find myself struggling, as usual.
The base of the page I did using my Copic markers and my ABS along with some of Coffee Break Stencils. I hand doodled the borders and then cut and inked them using my Copics and shaded them in using some charcoal for depth.
The Lessons of History
3. Is it flexible? No. Paul’s belief is unnecessarily rigid. A more accurate belief might be that some people are more friendly and approachable than others. And even the same person will be more or less approachable depending on the exact conditions. Paul’s belief is a worst-case scenario, and it will limit him socially even when conditions are excellent. It will also serve him poorly in people-oriented careers, such as sales or communication.
Who would ever be afraid to say that they didn’t like living with a physical illness? So why the hell do we feel embarrassed / ashamed to say that they live with a mental illness?
This is the primary definition of the black universe in this text. The use of italics for the term (and not the article) both highlights the logical procedure of positive naming and distinguishes the name from the semantically proximate senses it can be confused with, namely: 1) the black universe as the literal material cosmos (universe which is generally black); 2) the black universe as the universal set of blackness (universe of black itself); 3) the black universe as a dark subset of the universe (universe that is other than not black). Independent of the definite article yet proper it, the black universe is not this or that black universe, but the universe in its blackness in a sense that at once includes, exceeds, and perfects what we think ‘universe’ signifies. Essential to the formulation is its exposure of ignorance as to what we mean when we use the word universe (the unbounded place we find ourselves in? the infinity of reality? the present sum of all actuality and possibility?). The idea of the black universe isolates the profound, truthful stupidity at the center of the concept of universe, its obscure glow, and refocuses it into a definite illumination, a dark intelligible ray. In Part I, this visionary stupidity is identified in explicitly khoric terms, recalling the “spurious reasoning” (logismo tini notho) by which Socrates says we perceive without sense the “third nature” of eternal space, “beholding
All in all, Korean Tofu House is legit. The flavors are spot on and it holds it’s own with other legit Korean food spots and half of the management team here at FCF frequented Koreatown in Los Angeles quite often over a 10 year stretch so that’s saying something. It’s off the beaten path, it’s slightly under the radar and it’s certainly worth a go at lunch…just make sure you don’t have a meeting immediately afterwards.
And now onto the challenge! This week's Whimsical Wednesday challenge is Add Texture! Create any card or project, in any theme, with texture incorporated into it. Like so many, I love this quality in handmade cards. There are so many ways to add texture, from a small accent to a primary focal point.
I have been involved in Guiding since I was 7 years old when I became a Brownie. I spent the next 3 years as one then moved onto being a Guide - this is where I had a slight difference of opinion with the Guide Captain and left when I was 13 years old! Because I wanted to stay I managed to persuade the Young Leader coordinator that I could start as a Young Leader then instead of waiting until I was 14. I was a Young Leader when we celebrated our 75th anniversary of Guiding and was chosen to meet the Guiding light which was making it's way around the country when it arrived at Exeter - that was a great experience.
Overall, it's pretty tasty, but the smoke really is a lot to handle. Be ready!
I feel strongly that when you accept an invitation, you make a contract to be a good guest; arrive on time (never early), bring a thoughtful hostess gift (flowers are okay, but only if you bring them in a vase, seriously though, you can be more creative than that), play along with the program for the evening (if it’s a Luau, where a hula skirt, but you may forgo the coconut bra…. though do wear a bra.), be engaged in conversation (you are not there to be entertained, you are part of the entertainment. Be witty and charming and keep offensive opinions to yourself…. if you would like to be invited back), help clear the table (scrape the plates, rinse and stack. That’s enough. I know I have a system ~shocking~ and would prefer to finish things up myself), don’t overstay your welcome (if there is no more wine…go home! If your hosts put on their pajamas…go home!).
I have also been hearing many good reviews of Maybelline’s Color Tattoo eyeshadows. I’ve never had much confidence in the staying power of any eyeshadow, simply because my eyelids produce natural eyeshadow repellent. No, I’m serious. Despite many different primers and many different brands and many different formulations. In any case, I figured it wouldn’t hurt to try Color Tattoo, since it’s inexpensive and I was redeeming it with my points anyway.
The two bahutier shops and residences pictured above, which feature architecture that is typical of the city's merchant bourgeoisie, pre-date the name change by some margin: number
So what’s next for Gosselin? She’s apparently thinking about getting into TV production.
…or Clash of the Titans! Linkin Park, who won with over 87% against R.E.M now have to fight Paramore, who beat Kings of Leon with over 76%! Paramore are tough competition for Linkin Park, but if we fans unite, we might beat them. It’s gonna be bloody though!
Challenge 16: July 29
It strokes with purpose, the inner folds of delicious desire.
This week and next week, we're running a query letter clinic. We'll be looking at two types of query letters: the kind you send to agents and editors to get them to want to read your manuscript, and the kind you send to reviewers to get them to read your novel. We'll pick 5 random query letters this coming weekend and post them on our site one letter per day next week for analysis based on our experiences with querying. Commenters can leave helpful thoughts on why they might or might not request these manuscripts.
Congratulations to all of you & enjoy your prizes! Please contact us using the 'e.mail us' link on the side bar & we'll get your prizes to you. Thank you very much to all our sponsors too.
Thank god, a one-seater, things were looking up. I locked the door behind me and immediately turned the water on in the sink, kind of to set the mental mood and make sure no one could hear me.
Dal Bosco then absconded with the bonds and tried to cash them variously with the UN with the assistance of Giancarlo Bruno of the World Economic Forum who is one of the coordinators. It is purported that Mr. Bruno set up the entire operation with the UN and OITC which Dal Bosco turned to for support once they recognized that Neil Keenan was not going to allow them to steal the bonds.
This barely reported giant step into darkness (few journalists understood it) turned loose banks, insurance companies, and brokers to engage in just about any business they wanted – businesses they knew nothing about, including the underwriting of a treacherous vehicle called the credit default swap. It basically insured the losses of crap-shooting masters of the universe even though the guarantors had no way to pay up and no way to disentangle the crazy derivatives they created. Meanwhile, Alan Greenspan, possibly the dumbest bastard in America, looked for new ways to deregulate other greedy bastards like himself who were almost as dumb as he is.
The phone rang. Solemn answered it. Listened, and said, 'We're on our way.' Then he closed the phone.
8. Hark, The Herald Angels Sing - Vince Guaraldi Trio
Now, I am not trying to convince everyone that this will work. Not everyone needs convincing. Some people have already done the heavy lifting and now can set back and enjoy their lives. For some, the heavy lifting was done before they were born, and all they have to do is stay on course, not jump the track. But some of us, we have been doing it all wrong from the start. We have avoided the heavy lifting, and never seem to get over the Big Hills, because we are out of gas when we get there. No I think that if maybe one percent of the people out there agree with me, or think maybe I am not so crazy, that would be a great start. Heck I would take 10 People who want to roll the dice and pull together to do the heavy lifting. Not so easy to find those 10 People, but I am trying.
When: May 9, 2011, 4-5 pm
4. Exempt Homestead Property Limited to $500,000 of Equity
Every now and then I get a comment asking me to post pictures of me wearing the different makeup items I review here. I would love to, I really would! But most of the time, I'm not wearing a whole "look" of new makeup that I'd like to be photographed in. Indeed, most of the time, it's more like this:
Paul then picks up on the theme of retribution and vindication, a prevalent in the Old Testament, as a means to comfort the young church. Depicting in apocalyptic imagery the vindication of the suffering ones at the return of the Suffering One.
Why the obsession?
Monday - Chicken, sausage and bean stew
And what better way to start this feature by showcasing the screen debut of America's eternal sweetheart from the 1947 film So Well Remembered, the British class warfare story of a progressive newspaper man fighting the uncaring industrial and social system that exploited and ravaged his hometown. Actor John Mills, known for making his movies a family affair, brought along daughters Hayley and Juliet for parts in the film. Hayley Mills receives an uncredited appearance as an orphaned infant, adopted by Trevor Howard who plays the drunken town doctor who may have botched the delivery and caused the death of her mother.
This diversity and openness to different genres is reflected in Aldrei's line-up. Punk band Morðingjarnir perform an adrenaline-fuelled set, which is cut short when the drunk bassist is carried off the stage for exhorting the audience to throw things at him.
While the Los Angeles crowd were entertained by host Bob Hope, the attendees to the first official bicoastal New York ceremony were met by co-host Fredrick March, a two-time Academy Award winner. The event was broadcast from 5 Columbus Circle, at the International Theatre.
If he liked her. Besides,
It is the nature of human beings, and perhaps all creatures, to reach for something more than mere physical existence, and as Pi’s ordeal progresses, bigger concerns begin to sweep into the metaphysical vacuum that results when life is lived simply as a brutish exercise in survival. Ultimately, the tale examines the nature and consequences of fear, the strength and value of the life force, that powerful and mysterious will to live innate to all animate beings, the relationship between understanding, belief and reality, and what evidence there might be within life to support the idea of the divine.
As I said above there are some hilarious interactions between characters, especially when the team begins its crawl towards formation. The film is an action packed epic, it has enough dramatic impact to distract from the sometimes by the numbers scenes, there is also some almost out of place comedy, it doesn’t quite fit with the scene but not in a bad way, in a very funny way, comic relief I believe they call it and it does work. Though I say some of the scenes are by the numbers typical of a big budget they are still fantastic, the battle scenes are awe inspiring.
But, you see.
“There’s no bullying from any of the children and we get on really well with the local residents.”
One of our friend’s roofs collapsed; our friends are sleeping outside in tents; our friends have dead friends; our friends are scared to go back into their homes. We recognize places on TV & the internet as places we walked, talked, shopped, and played. As we went about our lives here, it was as if nothing happened, but in the back of our minds we couldn’t help think about all our friends whose lives had been altered forever.
July 31 – Seattle, Gas Works Park
Ranked #96 on Stuff magazine's "102 Sexiest Women In The World" list of 2002.
Abduction of Innocence 1996 Hollywood Movie Watch Online Full Movie
“The best comparison I could think of was: This must be what it’s like to be waterboarded…. Advice, objections, encouragement, discouragement, fan letters and death threats were coming at me so fast I could barely breathe…. Manning the buckets were the national media, the unions, civil rights groups, business groups and political operatives all the way up to the president himself. Was it torture? I never did ask Dick Cheney, but I’ll tell you this: It was not an experience I want to repeat” — p.3 (NY’s “Midday New York Numbers,” 10/17).
I returned to the restaurant where I had ordered some food and shakily drank some water. The photos aren't that great and probably not worth getting arrested over, but sometimes I feel the need to do it anyway. Otherwise why am I here?
If the concept of parenting yourself with love and understanding is a process you are willing to consider then you will definitely want to listen to this hour of possibilities. If the concept of supporting yourself through the support you provide to others – through your mirrors and through the ‘boomerang law’ is of interest then this show is for you.
So blow the results here
Add the milk. Use small amounts at a time. It will balance the saltiness of the mushroom soup.
but here is my latest painting.
Khar said she hoped this “tendentious move” would not be allowed to get through the US House of Representatives by a vast majority of Congressmen who continued to support friendly relations between the two countries.
Television pictures showed two bodies covered by tarpaulins outside a house.
In addition to moisturize and smooth the skin, this mask also serves to replace the cells of dead skin cells with new ones, so your skin will look radiant.
Bottom line: People have come to demand jumbo lump so much that most restaurants buy Venezuelan or Indonesian crab rather than serve a local product. Gorelick talks to people who prefer the Maryland crab. Then he followed up with two blog posts about how he thinks the "jumbo lump" craze started and a Maryland company that sells packages that contain meat from the whole crab.
Unfortunately, Montgomery County’s draft bill fails to sufficiently define its terms, thus inviting arbitrary, discriminatory arrests and overzealous enforcement.
I spent a huge chunk of today at Barnes & Noble, just catching up on some magazines + Starbucks indulgences... it was divine. But even cooler, I was introduced to B&N's newest product, the Nook! AKA, Kindle's worst enemy. I was super impressed with the Nook's customizable features (designer covers!), Wi-Fi accessibility, and overall sleek, easy-to-use eReader design. (Maybe even prettier than Kindle's design? What do you think?)
Now there are two ways to think about flexibility: static and dynamic flexibility. Static flexibility is how far a joint can hold a particular pose. For example it’s like the ability for a cheerleader to keep their leg next to their ears. Dynamic flexibility is how far a joint can flex in motion, such as a cheerleaders high kick. But both types of flexibility affect and impact the other.
Q099) The normal DARA is what kind of person?
In big vats of molasses, children at the Volk School Orania, cultivate microorganisms.
Keep a radio playing.
when love seemed so serene, so sweet?
Long as he stays away from the battle's fray
Very good beer, and I'll look for more in the future. I think it was only about four or five bucks, making it a steal.
Looms but the Horror of the shade,
“Imposing columns surround the school in the way of the temple, but are only wide enough for the pathways leading to the main walls. Rising three stories, the first floor is given way to the cafeteria, library and a small theatre along with other main rooms. The second floor is for the various classrooms and the third is the faculty lodging. The second and third floors open to an interior open courtyard, accessible by stairwells located on the balconies.
i may need to take a 4 or 5 month break before i attempt any other project around my house....yah. that was a joke, but it will probably become a reality.
and red envelopes. But have you ever stopped to really consider what it all means? The Chinese zodiac is more than just pretty pictures of animals you see at your local Chinese restaurant. There is a long history and tradition that is very important to Chinese culture.
Mash’Allah la quwwata illa billah! (WHATEVER ALLAH (GOD) WILLS. THERE IS NO POWER EXCEPT FROM ALLAH)
Prissy might take it another way completely, the wrong way. And that’s bad really really bad because she’s a black belt, a cop and has a temper of a bull in one of those runs in Spain. Now she stops talking to him, doesn’t visit his blog, and if she does it’s only to drop snide comments, all for the sake of a pair of stupid pink socks (for the love of all things holy, don’t tell her I said that), mostly because she misread the message what he meant to send across. I don’t know what happened to him. I’m too scared to find out.
Now, while that is getting nicely heated, start to mix up your batter. I use the measurements very loosely....no need to be exact!
THIS year, I used vacation days in addition to my day off and Independence Day holiday to get Tuesday July 3rd afternoon through Sunday July 8th off. And Wanting to GO somewhere, but having limited funds, we are off to Montana for at least a part of that–depending on how much time off Cool can get. Montana, because it’s cheaper then Seattle–and slightly closer. Though we could have chosen The German, I suppose. But that’s good for short trips since we would have to pay to stay the night there.
The film diligently follows the unbalanced life of one Dawn Davenport: thief, stripper, waitress, single mother, prostitute, abused wife, disfigured super-model, liquid eyeliner addict, and mass murderer.
Exposed railyards, highways, and rail lines that cleave neighborhoods apart have periodically been built over to open up surrounding land for development—most notably along Park Avenue in Midtown. Just a few blocks west sits Caemmerer Yards in the Hudson Yards area, which will be decked over for housing, offices, a cultural center and public open space. There are numerous opportunities to reknit the city’s neighborhoods together.
“Goo-” He interrupted before she could get to the “d.”
1. The Coming Of Kohoutek (White, Argent) 10:34
I have been doing Judy's Sunday Stash Report this year, and it has been a blast! I have made new blog friends and have seen some incredible stash busting! Unfortunately, I wasn't one of the stash busters. This was a year of stash enhancement for me, ahem, but it was still a lot of fun and I'm definitely playing next year.
I hate my job. Actively, passionately hate my job. I realize that the great majority of the population share that hatred.
Location: Long Beach, CA
Out to Play is I suppose quite typical of a play-care after school club. We pick the kids up from five schools either on foot or by minibus and take them to a multi-purpose centre annexed to the local church. Having come to this job after many years on adventure playgrounds, I sometimes struggle with the conditions the kids have for playing, and I have for playworking. My former adventure playground was at times less than ideal for the local children – though like a number of playwork professionals I doubt that ‘an ideal setting’ created by adults could ever actually exist. In comparison to my old addy, however, this space feels extremely reduced; a single-function room where the kids gather ’round ancient tables and must make do with what are in broad playwork terms very limited resources and affordances.
Matthias
I reviewed what compare and contrast meant (again) and made a quick Venn diagram on the board comparing two things.
OK. She was slender and not too tall. But what did her face look like?
Now isn't this just the most adorable stamp ever!?!? I am in love with how this card turned out! I thought the papers were perfect for it!!! And the sentiment is just perfect!
The setting is the Agricultural Hall in London in November 1879 and all the action is set during a six-day endurance test, or ‘wobble’, at the end of which will be crowned the ‘Champion pedestrian of the World’. The competitors (inevitably for the period they are all men), with only occasional breaks, will have to walk hundreds of miles round the less than salubrious indoor track until by the end of the sixth day the person who has walked the farthest (and is still standing) will win a prize of £500. Appropriately enough perhaps, and typical of this author’s sly cunning, the book itself grew out of a contest initiated by Macimillan with a prize of £1,000. Lovesey was the winner of the contest, selected from around 250 submitted manuscripts, and is still hard at it today (he is currently in the US promoting his latest ‘Peter Diamond’ mystery). This debut also introduced the adventures of Victorian policeman Detective Sergeant Cribb and his sidekick Constable Thakeray and its success led to a revival in the fortunes of the historical crime novel.
Dw is in Colorado packing up the last of our things and heading back home tomorrow with the loaded U-Haul. Graham and Liberty are with him.
Yet Mr. Campbell’s strangest examples feature animals. He tells the story of a storm that ravaged the Hebrideani sland of St. Kildain 1840. A Great Auk, rare in those parts, was seen walking on the beach; it was captured and put on trial for instigating the fatal storm. The Auk, already a flightless bird, was found guilty and stoned to death. In a similarly vengeful spirit, a Parisian cow was executed in 1546 for having amorous relations with a man, though common sense indicates that the man was likely the aggressor. In a nod to fairness, both were hanged, then burned.
Ever since the weather warmed up a few weeks ago, I have been on an ice cream and sorbet making run. There is nothing like eating homemade ice cream. Not only can you avoid using all the stabilizers that are in grocery-store ice cream, but you can also adjust flavors to your own personal tastes.
Timestamp: 2008-12-01 04:14:54 UTC
Shredded a few slice of ginger thinly.
When I couldn’t block thoughts I used mantras like: Relax completely . . . Calm yourself . . . Breathe . . . Turn off .
Seriously, NO MESS! You can whip your hand across it and nothing comes off, nothing on your craft space, or if you are like me and glitter on your pants and face! LOVE this :)
We are finally out of party mode. September and October are always full of parties but we can now take a breather before Christmas comes around. Lucy had her party a week ago. It was so cute!! She had her "pink afternoon tea " party on a Monday afternoon so the kiddies that are already in kindy could come along as well. We had the house full of pink dressed girls (plus a couple of non pink boys). We played some fun games like "blik gooien(don't know the English word for that) sack race, hat decorating, hoola hoops, hop scotch, pass the parcel and musical statues. We had lots of pink food like cupcakes, macaroons, meringues etc etc. All the kiddies were wonderful and seemed to be having a great time. And of course Lucy got loads of pressies. i made all the kids a fabric flower and pinned that on their tulle lolly bag. The flower is a brooch so they can use it again (hopefully!!)
No flying until max level.
Shorleline Foggy Loggy Lager 4.4%
1/2 t worcestershire sauce
**Second Toll Free Number Customer Service Number Provided By Commenter Plain Jane
I love food. It’s one of the reasons that I come back home to Kansas City – home to my house when I’m out and about and home to the States when I’m traveling abroad. I’d rather eat at home than out at a restaurant nine times out of ten. And when I’m overseas, mostly eating out at restaurants, I miss home for food.
Whichever zodiac sign is rising in the east becomes the “first house.” The next sign is the second house, and so forth. So, if you have Aries rising, then Aries is the first house. The next sign, Taurus is the second house. Gemini is the third house, etc. If Cancer, instead, is rising then Cancer is the first house, Leo the second, Virgo the third, and so on. This is how the “whole-sign house” system works. If you use this simple system with the accurate sidereal zodiac, it works.
Positron emission tomography (PET) is a noninvasive nuclear test used to evaluate the heart tissue. A PET scanner traces high-energy gamma rays released from radioactive particles to provide three-dimensional images of the heart tissue. Performed at a hospital, it usually takes from one hour to one hour and 45 minutes. CT and MRI are computerized scanning methods.
it's said that "green is the pervasive color in the natural world, making it an ideal backdrop in interior design because we are so used to seeing it everywhere." that must be why i live where i do and decorate the way i do. our home has green carpet, green kitchen and bathroom linoleum, green curtains, green tile, and many green accessories... furniture, lamps, throw pillows, artwork, dishes, boxes, candles...i could go on and on! i think another reason it is one of my favorite colors is because it goes well with so many other colors!
Then he abandoned the human face and figure for woods and trees, often with a bird or a flock of birds flying around. He felt very strongly, throughout his life, the personality of trees, of things and of places. Certain places seized his imagination. At Dymchurch in Kent, in the early 1920s, he painted and sketched the sea wall and the sea over and over again. More often, though, he moved restlessly from place to place, looking, sketching, trying out ideas. He and Margaret were almost constantly on the move, sometimes together, sometimes apart, and often in the midst of crisis.
This is my new favorite thing. Seriously.
Our project in class Wednesday night was to reuse our old crayons. We had about two gallon Ziploc bags full of old crayons. So, we made colored people and used the project to remind the kids that Jesus loves people. All of us. Red, yellow, black and white (or any mixture thereof).
If I was dragged to the vet at the moment, there would be plenty of sympathetic clucking and soothing words.
OR does the situation suddenly have no point to it….
What gives me hope is that their practice of eating together was not primarily determined by social categories or economic status. Their gathering together as a community demonstrated something different had taken place that transcended the normal factors that ordered life. Even folks who were not in the habit of eating together began to sit around the same table. Jews and Gentiles. Circumcised and uncircumcised. Slave and free. Women and men.
Caleb Prior
Now this leads me into the next evolution.
The store that I purchased this from (for $30), wants to charge $9 for a breakout board for this, which I feel is kind of crazy (with that money, I could add an ATMEGA328 to parse the GPS), so I made a cheap $0.30 breakout board (well components push the board price to 0.50 or 1.00). It has the connections for USART and USB, and I plan to have an RJ45 connector to put this GPS circuit somewhere remote (RJ45 – ethernet connector). Thinking about disguising it in a gum box, but then again, it would be a gum box + ethernet cable coming out of it, so not much of a disguise.
The All-Attractive said:
to love
in a saucepan, heat cream, vodka, zest and nutmeg over low heat until warmed. season with salt and pepper
We had a great time.
Gerald is not a happy elephant when he feels something land on his head. What could it be? What could it possibly be? Luckily, Gerald isn't alone as this drama unfolds. He has a friend, a good friend, Piggie. There is much silliness involved in this ongoing drama. It's fun. It's cute. I liked it!
1. I am a serious night owl. Always have been. Not sure why, but I’m far more productive at night.
“There is a lifetime of work at Green-Wood for me,” Feldman says.
She will be eligible for parole in 10 years. As her public defender said: ”She is getting a greater penalty for having a boy touch her breast than if she killed him.”
Chaos ensued, to such an extent that both local and national police had to be deployed to direct traffic away from the gridlock on the border between these two towns. Motorist were directed around the problem on to the narrow suburban roads, unsuitable for the volume of traffic, hence more chaos.
The silence of Christ can often be a test as it was for the Woman of Canaan, a test of faith:
ASK AWAY!!!!
All other times pinxtos are $2 each
FACTOID: Cameos from the stars of the original series include Jonathan Frid, Kathryn Leigh Scott, David Selby and Lara Parker.
*weeps for Bright Star*
less terrifying and with more light than this one.
Obviously, the decorating/styling is very different, but I'm wondering the photographer is the same? Notice that the photo was taken just above the level of the faucet handle in both. In other words, lower than eye level.
Got a thumb?
The downside of using this camera? One, it is plastic and I am pretty afraid of accidentally breaking it as I am wandering around trying to seduce the goats into a perfect pose. Two, it really doesn’t work well at all unless it is really sunny… It doesn’t have a flash and just does not shoot well indoors at all. BUT, the only days I really want to lounge around and take artsy retro film pictures are when I am outside enjoying the sunshine.
"And why should I live there?"
As pro-lifers know, during the fight over Wealthcare, the obama henchmen, Nancy Pelosi and Harry Reid set as one of their top priorities the channeling of taxpayer money to DEATHER’s (abortionists).
For the centerpiece, I used my PB bay leaf candle holder thingy that I'm pretty sure almost everyone on the planet owns.
Then, you lost your fucking mind. For two straight weeks, I wanted to punch you, right in your head. (I never would, of course…but, boy did I want to)
Seriously, Just Go to Sleep came to be when Mansbach read a highly censored rendition of the original book to his three-year-old daughter, and she recognized herself as the culprit and was delighted. "We were getting a lot of feedback from parents, saying that their kids loved the book--read in an altered form--because they recognized themselves in the character of the mischievous kid who's winning the bedtime battle, and thought it was hilarious. So we figured we’d do a companion volume that lets kids in on the fun."
She pandered to public sector union bosses, she mishandled scandals, she increased government spending.
I thought it would help my readers (both of them) if I listed the posts, with links, and a brief comment on each.
I always find it interesting how defensive writers get over their genre. In some ways, it almost reminds me of religion. Everyone is so convinced that their beliefs (or genre) is the only good thing out there, that they fail to see merit in what anyone else (other writers and readers) believes.
"My ex-MIL, I can't let her un-thaw."
Please visit these designers' blogs (after 9 am Central) to see what fabulous Christmas projects they have for you on the hop today!
1345 **D-IV/18/2000. “Abraham Lincoln and a Trial for ‘Murder.’” Faculty Workshop, Loyola University of Chicago School of Law, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2000(9), above, pp. 81-92.)
For those of us who lived in Kensington for a while, the new “Foodtown” on McDonald and Albemarle Road was once the “Grand Union”. The Grand Union was the biggest Supermarket in Kensington and certainly dwarfed anything on Church Avenue at the time.
place. He showed my boys where certain effects come from and how the show is set up.
I've spun the wheels in light snow, a first with 80k on.
I did take a tour around the neighborhood the other day.
Statements like "When my hair is so and so length it’ll be so fabulous" or "I can’t wait for my hair to be longer" and such.
(*Because i reviewed holiday cards from tinyprints.com, i will be compensated with 50 free cards. you can earn this great reward too! find out more on this post, at the tinyprints.com blog)
A year and a half ago, Aniruddha gifted me this skirt from Loose Ends. The print on the fabric is very vibrant and happy. Of course, I used to also think ‘unusual’.
It is brutal and ruthless, with high rewards for the winners and big losses for the losers and I am sometimes, glad to be out of it. But when I played it, I played it well. John of Gwent is a witness to what I say. Politics for me now, is a walk in the park.
"I know this one of St John's Hospital (the old Poor Law Workhouse) has been on before but John Eastwood raised a question about the Workhouse yesterday and it got me to thinking about the inhumanity of the old Poor Law system.
Their lifestyle was very structured. My Uncle Earl owned Pendall's Drug Store in Marquette, he was a pharmacist. Aunt Becky ran the household. She played golf, she played bridge, and she and Uncle Earl enjoyed a full rich social life in Marquette. But oh could Becky make egg coffee.
With the first sip, the bottle labeling is proven true. It tastes like a traditional Balvenie whisky, born of a bourbon cask and exceptionally regal. The oak, honey, and vanilla are there, like a comfortable liturgy of familiarity. But with the finishing process taking place in a Madeira wine cask, you realize that this liturgy was meant to serve a high feast day. The label suggests spice and fruit, but I would suggest that neither of these are particularly prominent, only resonant. With the spice, maybe a pinch of cinnamon within the Madeira cask as a whole and reflected in every bottle of its bosom; and the fruit, a peach perhaps.
There are physical advantages, too. If you’re moving house, e-books are a LOT lighter to carry. And you don’t have to chop down any trees to make an e-book, so if it’s a million-copy seller then reading it in e-format might do the planet a favour… though the Muse can’t decide if using an electronic device to read it cancels this out.
Not only this but someone even stepped forward from somewhere offering to medicate Breivik with anti-psychotic drugs during his trial. How blatant is that, wanting to pump him with drugs so that he does looking like Charles Manson in trial for the Worlds media. A dribbling psychotic for the cameras to re-enforce the ‘official line’ of insane.
The crowd laughed.
Taking Kraft card stock, trimming to form the card base and adding strips of pattern paper, one with stamping of butterfly border from the Studio Calico/Hero Arts, Calico Borders, embossed with white embossing powder, with the other strip of pattern paper, I cut a V in one end and added a border sticker. Moving onto the layering, I cut out a butterfly from pattern paper from the kit using a Spellbinders Butterfly Die and adhered this to a Martha Stewart Doily, adding a Amy Tangerine material flower to the centre of the butterfly, also adding this to a journal card, along with sticker, gems and using the Kraft letter stickers that came with the kit, adding a sentiment to a trimmed piece of white card stock to complete the card.
10-Gerardo Perez-Lake Zurich-14:38
Having said this, alumni are also one of the most under-estimated, and at times, under-valued assets when it comes to the promotional, recruiting and fundraising opportunities of high schools and universities. When most of us think of alumni relation programs, the first thing that comes to mind is usually fundraising. However, a strong alumni relations program can be much more impactful from a marketing perspective than what you may initially expect.
#5 - Krafty Karen
Now I need enough for a decent car, then I will be happy.
In a more general sense, I’ve always been interested in folklore, myth and legend, so a lot of that stuff I already knew. Like Jake Harker in the book, I have my own ‘dark catalogue’ of horror knowledge that I’ve been slowly adding to over the years. Since the age of six, I’ve been obsessed with all those things that go bump in the night, so I can pepper my books with little mythological nuggets. Stuff like ‘Yaga Passage’: Baba Yaga was this horrible witch from Russian folklore – a child-eating sorceress who lived in a house supported on chicken legs. I always get a kick out of layering those kinds of nods to old folklore into my stories.
Of course you start adapting to everything after a while. And surely Park Slope is not without flaws. Annoying children running loose on the sidewalk, while their mothers are talking with each other and expecting you to move out of the child’s way. An appalled look from the caretaker once she realized I just did not care if her spoiled brat fell down in front of me and pointed out they better watch their children better.
Coach Miguel: The head coach, Miguel had a plan for the girls from day one, and he followed it. Thunder’s fine finish was the result. No stars, just crisp, accurate passing and hard, tight, team play.
taught me a democracy of the soul, to live
My mother in law Kath was almost 92 and had spent the last 5 years in a home, and for the last two in a local one which was so handy for my hubby Ian to visit her several times a week. She unfortunately suffered badly from dementia and found life a little distressing as she couldnt really understand what was going on around her and became rather aggresive at times, so to be absolutely honest I think both my hubby and I have come to the conclusion that its a very happy release for her, but it doesnt stop us missing her and the person she was ten years ago, a loving and generous person who was lost to her dementia.
If you’ve visited our Facebook page or signed our petition, or read the previous post on this blog, you’ll have noticed the imagery of David versus Goliath: we are 19 people taking on a multinational company. However, you might not have grasped the full meaning of this analogy. These days, when people think of a David-and-Goliath scenario, it’s in the context of a plucky underdog taking on a more powerful opponent and winning against the odds. But the story of David and Goliath is much more than that.
10. What's your favorite piece of jewelry?
All respect and praise for the design and production of the invitations AND website can be deservingly directed at my fellow third years, graduating in the show too: Alfie Kelly, Luke Chandler and Anthony Boyle (links redirect to sites of their most up-to-date projects). If they don’t open a collaborative studio and make it, then theres no hope for the rest of us!
to end poverty and hunger and care for the Earth.
Five minutes before cake is finished, make frosting. Mix together butter, cocoa and milk. Cook over medium heat and bring to a boil. Remove from stove and add sugar, nuts and vanilla. Mix well. Pour over cake while hot.
13 Great Cull
Other - Prima Flowers, Alphabet Stickers, Ocean themed stickers, Blue Jewel Embellishment
I enjoyed that so much that I got another man in who took two days to flatten my mound.
Step 2: Focus on the crims poor upbringing, his lack of opportunity in society, his social ineptitude. Well, sorry mate but shit begats shit. There are 4th generation bottom dwellers in Australia and they know how to work the system. The Judges, well, if you are an ethnic minority or can stitch the coppers up, they will simply bow down to you and give you a minimised sentence in the hope that you will be rehabilitated. Well done, bottom dwellers!!
So with that in mind I set to work. Only when I had finished I realised that I could not really enter it into the challenge as it did not meet the Less is More rules - it was a bit too busy, and not enough 'White Space'. But I liked it, so thought that I would post it anyway.
Wear My Ring Around Your Neck 2:28
There will be a time, or times, in every Christians life, when He will “Make you lie down in green pastures.” You may think to yourself, what is so “Green Pastures,” about a diagnosis of incurability or possible death. Let me tell you something brothers and sisters in Christ, when we have complete dependence upon God, even although we did not choose it(He makes you lie down) you will be in a place that is almost beyond description. The windows of heaven will open, you will hear heavenly choirs of angels, you will feel the sun on your face and it will feel so good, you will mount up with wings as eagles and soar high above the things of earth. From down through the centuries the martyr’s will call out to you and the same Spirit that comforted them in their greatest trials and allowed them to sing psalms of glory, even as the flames began to consume their temporal bodies, that same Spirit will burn like a mighty furnace in your chest, and if men could look into your situation, they would say “there is one like the son of man with Him,” and they would be right.
So there you go. These are only ten of the most effective ways on how to cure back acne.
I turned the key. It didn’t start.
"Congress has no power to disarm the militia. Their swords, and every other terrible implement of the soldier, are the birth-right of an American ...the unlimited power of the sword is not in the hands of either the federal or state governments, but, where I trust in God it will ever remain, in the hands of the people." - Tench Coxe, 1788
Re: “Because Jesus has been doing healings like this on the Sabbath”. John only describes the one healing, of the guy at the pool, but implies that Jesus has done other healings too, the descriptions of which apparently got left on the cutting room floor when John was putting his book together.
This recipe is one of my favorite since it reminds me of my favorite dish at the Brauhaus restaurant.
Hung in the golden Galaxy.
then score the other 12" side...
For my money: Opus was one of my favorite shows last year and definitely deserves Director or Play. I would not give it Artistic Specialization (it was nominated for Music Coach); one of the actors never once did vibrato on her viola!
Then something happens in the place that I crawl to beside him. This place that he carefully carved with his arms where my body feels the weight of his protection and the comfort of his love. He speaks to me and shows me his mercies. He begins to cut away that fruit, cut down the branches and uproot that bitter plant that grew so deep.
Oh Isaac.... he keeps us on our toes.... and just says sweet things sometimes, too.
After the cheerleading competition festivities we made our way across the state for my nephews 1st birthday. He was so stinkin cute and devoured his little smash cake. It is truly hard to believe that he is somehow a year old already and that time keeps going by so fast.
Him: Yes, actually, I do, but I’m in no rush.
How I wish we would simply grow the fuck up, and leave the 19th century behind (the IPC was written in 1860 – not a typo – and most parts haven’t been revised since).
The tailgating woman was furious and honked her horn, screaming in frustration, as she missed her chance to get through the intersection, dropping her cell phone and makeup.
1/4 to 1/2 teaspoon red pepper
The haunting climax of Little Broken Hearts is Jones’ moment of vengeance.
“Beautiful eyes”
Tomorrow I'll be joining the Stash Bash on Crunchy Catholic Momma and sharing pictures from Strawberry's birthday party. So if you'd like to see how cute those Maya Made inspired goody bags looked with treats inside them be sure to stop on by. I'll also show photos of the girls busy making candles and paper crafts too.
Kiedis
The more I write, the more I see my storyteller eyes honing and gasping more sensitively. My awareness of the world around me and the world's I create is greater and so is my perception. How do I see a particular scene or event as opposed to how I could see them.
Her granddaughter and grandson looked on, it is their world now and such a terrible one, behind them I stood, breaking heart and summer cold, the trick is at funerals I have learnt, is not to look to the distressed, to the weeping, lest you join them in solidarity. In any event behind me stood my son, owner of all he surveys but inheritor of nothing, government policy has put paid to that and he must join those others prior mentioned in the race for resource, for him and indeed all of my children, struggle and disinheritance and perhaps augmenting conflict.
Since we recently had some family photos taken by a professional photographer (who happens to be my bff--yay!), and since it is the first family picture we've had taken in about five years *gasp*, I decided to get one for us (um, you know, to be sure my parents will like theirs, lol). But...since my bff/photographer is SOOOO good, it was hard to choose a favorite picture for my photo to canvas.
The Independent, Gallup N.M.
Not today. Today I have so much to do, and so little energy, that I will either write directly here or not at all.
After what seems like so long
Rachel Caine
‘Pink’ Watson hooked me about three minutes into Orchids and Ermine. It was the scene where she wraps a white cat around her neck like a mink stole. This woman has nothing, but she knows what she wants.
Federal Reserve’s collection agency INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE – also a
We'd love help promoting the blogfest, as well. Feel free to take the button and banner and/or share the Linky Tool below. And I'm sure you will be hearing more about this over the next two months.
Before you speak to me about your religion, first show it to me in how you treat other people; before you tell me how much you love your God, show me in how much you love all children; before you preach to me of your passion for your faith, teach me about it through your compassion for your neighbors. In the end, I'm not as interested in what you have to tell or sell as in how you choose to live and give.
I like how they do the comparisons though. They say here is our Virtex-n basketball player and here is the best NBA Basketball player … and they show you crusty old Mike Bibby 2012. Then they say watch as the Virtex-n basketball player takes Mike Bibby down low in the post, and notice the Virtex-n basketball player is still growing exponentially. So you can imagine how much better he will do against Mike Bibby in the post next year. Finally they say that Mike Bibby was chosen as the best NBA player for this comparison by his father Henry, who was also a great NBA player.
I made two calls. The first was to Elizabeth, the nurse at his pediatrician's office, and the second was to Cheryl, the pharmacy technician at CVS. Because they are awesome, they were both on board with my plan. I walked Luke into his doctor's office, and he immediately began spilling his guts to Candi, the receptionist. "Miss Candi, I got some bad dweams about the scary bear, and the wolf. They locked-ed me in a cage and I got wost." I know, right? I'd be scared too.
I omitted Social Security, which has its own funding. In the fiscal year to date, which is seven months, we have paid $241 billion in interest, which works out to $413 billion for the year.
SSF reactivation after menopause (menopause reversal)
You could say it's a religion I live by. The tenets of this religion are simple but profoundly, deeply held:
Sooo, yah. That’s where I landed on the whole thing. What about you? What do you think? Drop me a line in the comments and let me know.
I have also been wanting to make the 7UP rolls that have been all over pinterest and thought that they would go perfect with this meal.I will update on Friday on how they turn out.
Amazing Grace, Amazing God.
Hybrid by 5THCELL just recently sent me a key to try out their beta. Redeeming the key and letting my Xbox download the 1.30gig demo, I figured I’d give it a shot.
Place potato cubes in a pot. Enough water until cover. Add potatoes and cook until tender.
I hope you're getting more done than I am.
Is there a song you could list as the theme song for your book or any of your characters?
Welcome first time and repeat readers! My seventh #sixsunday offering is below, while the previous contributions are easily accessible by clicking here. We previously met the MC, Erica, and the current traveling companions of Cindy and dog named Crystal. Last week, they met up with the first group of other living people.
Ramjas is a co-educational institution of higher learning located in University Enclave on the University of Delhi’s ‘North’ campus. In spite of its location in North India, the college has always striven to admit students and select teachers from all communities and from all parts of India. It also admits a small number of students from overseas.
Darth Fermentor, right hand of the Emperor. His face is blocked
The prince, who has remained unnamed but who was described by Nitzan as a "loyal regular customer", was sitting at the bar. He was approached by apparently rude plain-clothes police who demanded that he leave. When the prince replied that he wanted to finish his drink he was allegedly slapped off his chair by an officer.
didnt know who it was ,
But don't have no choice, no way
Andrew Bigart
1/4 cup spring onion (only onion)
Shea butter, Jojoba oil, Coconut Oil and Vitamin E impart serious moisture while SPF 8 protects lips from harmful UVA/UVB rays. This just-bitten tint of color provides immediate soothing relief to irritated chapped lips while also diminishing the appearance of fine lines and wrinkles around the lip area.
BM: They were all great. I had a terrific time doing it. Ron is a fine director and his casting is flawless, really. I could not have had a better time. It was amazing to be in certain scenes and the reenactors were so wonderful with the way they brought their own passion and life to it, which is more than what ordinary extras would bring, which is really nothing. I remember waking through the reenactment camp at night when they had their campfires going. Somebody would be playing a fiddle here and there and everyone was still basically in character and it was amazing—it was like time travel.
- I don’t like birds. The beak, the feathers, the whole bird. I don’t like it. I don’t like when they fly too close to me, and fact that they might bump into a window and die so easily is kind of gross. Ok, this is kind of weird ha ha! but it’s the truth. Swans are the birds I like least, but I definitely don’t like sea gulls either.
979. Wild Pomegranate Pecan Bar from Bora Bora @ My Desk (Phoenixville, PA) 10:04
Habits make us lazy, don't they? They make us function mechanically according to recurrent patterns. As soon as one of these patterns is disrupted, we get lost. As an experiment, you can try repeating aloud the lyrics of a song you know by heart without actually singing and much more slowly. Difficult, isn't it? Yes, because we broke a pattern; we broke a habit, and our mind is not used to novelty!
"George!" she exclaimed, without even pausing to think, and off she went to catch the school bus.
Never mind the fact that I used to turn my nose up at any kind of diet soda when I was a kid. The mere sight of TAB resurrected countless memories from my youth. I recalled the times my Mom would send me to the corner store with a couple of bucks for me to get her a TAB. She would let me use the change to buy whatever my heart desired. I remembered the girls at the neighborhood pool in the dead of summer, sunning themselves in bikini's and sipping on ice cold TAB's. And we mustn't forget about the commercials..
At his home in upstate New York Jimi Hendrix passes away from complications due to liver cancer. He is surrounded by his family and close friends. Bob Dylan calls it, “the saddest day in music history.” Keith Richards declares Hendrix, “the greatest mother fucker to ever lay his hands on the guitar.” Carlos Santana gives the eulogy at his funeral. After the service there is a performance that includes: BB King, Buddy Guy, Carlos Santana, Robert Cray, Paul McCartney, Stevie Winwood, Dave Grohl, John Paul Jones, Jeff Beck, Eric Clapton, Jack Bruce, John Mayer, Jack White, Kirk Hammett, Derek Trucks, Warren Haynes, and Neil Young. The group plays a 25-minute version of “Little Wing.”
You have no sense of humor/can’t handle criticism
Is that the case in England? Or are we paying our bills to rent the use of water which is then mostly returned to the companies for re-renting after clean-up? It's difficult to tell from the media announcements but they do take the form of specific prohibitions - 'banned' activities rather than banned mains water usage (you can leave your kitchen tap running and there's no penalty).
Leslie explained all the different paint finishes that are currently in vogue. Paint is very trendy - the bright and garish faux treatments of the 80s and 90s have disappeared in favor of very subtle treatments that provide more of a texture instead of color. Leslie is a real dyamo - a successful business owner, a mother and wife, and now an author! She is adorable, and very, very sweet. She tells us how she went from working in the coroporate world to starting a small paint company that today is a very large one that employs over 25 people!
2- 1x6 boards (for the support between the cubbies.)
.concrete forest
After Nutrition class, something I’m really interested in and passionate about came Principles of Beverage Service, something I….know very well.
Since I was there with my kids, I participated in the picture book reading of Stagecoach Sal! by Deborah Hopkinson, who then signed copies and gave them to the audience (sponsored by Wells Fargo). We enjoyed the Build Your Own Book craft with Scholastic, the Book Nook provided by Target, and danced to the fun music of Steve Songs in the PBS kids tent. Though we just missed Clifford, and avoided the long line to meet the Cat in the Hat, we did get to meet Martha, from Martha Speaks (though my 2-year-old refused to get anywhere near her).
So go plunge your local Goodwill today. You’ll find something you’ll treasure, I guarantee it.
and imagine my mornings in London.
What nearly killed the SUV sector was the viability of running the things. Vehicles like the RAV4, CR-V, Freelander followed by the Tiguan have managed to survive but with entry prices £20,000 or more it’s a bit of a stretch from the price of a family hatch.
This was supposed to be a different post, but I didn't feel that great this weekend so I ended up in bed most of the time. My iPhone and a couple books kept me company. I ended up finishing one I'd been reading for a while, and reading 2 others. They were all so different, yet I LOVED all of them.
From April 2nd until May 11th 2012
Anyone else have an Ereader that you luurve and cannot live without??
Allow for good and loving memories of the holiday season in the hearts and minds of my children.
Lavanya Krishnan
There was a night of visiting friends in September. The Traaseth's had come up from Georgia and we met up with lots of other friends down at First Friday in Johnson City. After traipsing around downtown, laughing, talking, wandering in and out of art and music, some of us headed for Mid-City grill.
I get more queries than I can post. That's all.
Anyway, they wanted to do a couple's costume, so the hunt began for an Alice in Wonderland dress. This was a challenge, because she did not want "Sexy Alice", which is pretty much all they sell in adult sizes. My sister rose to the occasion and took her to a mack daddy costume shop, to no avail. I took her here and there, spent some time poring over pattern books... finally, we had two days left, and we determined to spend the whole day looking for the costume. Twelve hours of shopping for a blue dress. Twelve. By hour 10, we were about to pass out, and a kind and well-meaning saleslady mentioned that blue dresses are really hard to find. Oh, really? Thanks for letting us know! By hour eleven, MC was grasping at anything blue she happened to see.
In retrospect, she'd felt that 1993's Debut had been somewhat tentative and tame: "I had very safe pop songs...and I was sort of shy and humble towards the whole thing," she said in 1995. "This time I felt more at ease." Shedding the boutique-and-soiree-friendly aspects of Debut that allowed some cynics to dismiss her as a Sade-for-the-'90s, Bjork took the three million copies Debut sold worldwide as license to experiment. She hooked up with multiple collaborators from differentcutting edges, and forged a schizo-eclectic tour-de-force. The orchestral grandeur of "Isobel," the technoid seduction of "Possibly Maybe," the industrial juggernaut of "Army of Me," and the big band retro-romp of "It's Oh So Quiet" each highlighted a different facet of her fascinatingly mutable identity. This fracturing of persona was further dramatized in a series of brilliantly inventive and wildly different videos which diversified Bjork's established space-pixie/child-sprite image.
The point is, her stories were important to her, so she scheduled her other activities in such a way that she had time for them. And that’s a lesson we can all learn as writers.
I do have one thing in my favor. I am a much better writer than I was when I wrote the first draft of More Deaths Than One, so perhaps I can keep the story going with Chip alone. (Saying I am a much better writer now is not necessarily saying I am a good writer. The first draft of More Deaths Than One was laughably bad. That I found an agent for it says more about the agent than it does my writing. No surprise – he couldn’t sell it.)
Pakistani police spokesman Nasir Butt said that the 58-year-old cab driver is being treated as the chief suspect in the case.
In making the ruling, the Federal Court made some interesting, almost State-Street-like, findings:
unauthorized and illegal in the Republic. JOHN HENRY DOE, ESQUIRE is a
Hendrick’s Gin, Cucumber & Melon, Lime
Especially when one of those two seems quite happy in the others company, and the other seems bored out of their head!
Sparkle E-mails Landlord:
I am so sorry to hear about your mishaps with your Naot shoes! I read the blog and was thoroughly entertained but also a bit upset at the idea of you falling down due to your recent Zappos purchase.
So for the sake of taking you along with me – just cause I feel better not being so alone – here is what they do… they prep ya like you are having surgery, making you wonder if they do, in fact, remember that they are NOT doing that and that you are very much AWAKE! Big scanning machines taking real time photos and Xrays or whatnot are constantly scanning so they get the needles in the right place. This is both conforming and a bit unnerving.
Three course a la carte $120
Again to my horror, I realised that all of the other notebooks in the drawer were also recipe/menu notebooks of his. He has only been a fully qualified chef for 4 years, and yet he has managed to fill 8 or 9 notebooks (all fading) with barely legible, scribbled, and utterly amazing creations.
If you have been following my blog, recently.
Tuesday, 3 April: At van der Merwe (68) died after he had been severely assaulted on his farm in the Leeubosch area in the Bloemhof district.
Two months later
With apt and joyful humor.
We’ve been putting off a Living Will since 2005 when Terri Schiavo’s case hit the media. Remember that? What exactly do we need to protect ourselves since closed-minded people prevent us from getting married? A Living Will, but what else? Should we get a lawyer?
I've trans-mogrified the new section for ease of reading:
t's been only three years since Iceland's new king of lo-fi layered lushness, Sindri Már Sigfússon, began his official recording career. “Summer Echoes”, the new and second album of his solo-project Sin Fang (he dropped the “Bous”) is now already his 4th album release (including 2 records of his other musical outlet Seabear) since 2007. The album oscillates wildly unearthing glimpses of familiarity - vintage Flying Nun here, Paw Tracks there and a Belle and Sebastian pop nous - while retaining the own stark originality of this uber-talented artist and producer. And Sigfússon is a pretty unlikely ambassador of the Icelandic indie pop scene: in his teens he was a skateboard and Hip Hop aficionado, his arms are covered with a colourful mess of self designed tattoos and besides doing visual arts his true favourite obsessions are soccer and pizza: what makes him pretty much an antidote to the all too present cliché of the Icelandic nature boy. Sigfússon didn’t pick up a guitar until he was 20 but after graduating from art academy and moving to London he became sick and bought his first proper home recording equipment from the insurance money he got. And within just a few years, his infamous work ethic (he has a very strict 9 to 5 routine working on songs in his basement studio) and distinctive do-it-yourself production style culminated in the Sin Fang (Bous) debut album “Clangour” which was released on Morr Music in 2009 to worldwide acclaim and suddenly propelled him in the midst of a new wave of bands redefining the indie rock game in thus far unexpected directions. Enthusiastic media and blog coverage and live shows in Europe, North America and Brazil followed. After having set himself the task of playing all instruments on his debut solo album "Clangour", this time around Sigfússon wanted to move closer to the sound of a live band and recruited a number of his friends from Múm, Amiina and Seabear to record “Summer Echoes” in his own studio and Sigur Rós Sundlaugin studio. The arrangements are more band oriented, grander in scope and more transparent than their predecessor’s and there is a diverse breadth of sounds across "Summer Echoes" dozen songs, reaching from a heart-breaking intimate piano ballad like “Two Boys” to sudden outbursts of guitar noise in “Bruises”. Not even the one-off appearance of synthetic beats in "Sing For A Dream" sound out of place when drenched in Sin Fang's signature layered wash of sound and it is the album's first single, "Because Of The Blood" that encapsulates the essence of this album in an euphoric orchestral pop song that manages to merge epic tune sculpting with several layers of choir abundance. The fact that Sigfússon did not only write all the music but also was doing most of the recording and production promises a lot for his future and “Summer Echoes” conveys the feeling that the real story has only just begun: and in fact a next Sin Fang album is already fully written and Sigfússon shows no willingness to slow down.
It’s this injection of ‘fracking fluid’, a chemical cocktail with possible unknown health effects, and the shattering of the geological strata; that raises concerns about the possible contamination of UK groundwater. If the rock strata that contains the groundwater lie within the vicinity of the shale gas deposit, then the possibility of potential contamination from this chemical cocktail (and the gas itself?) must be a huge risk. Is the possible contamination of the UK’s groundwater for cheaper energy bills worth this health risk?
(This is why I like using the Ziplock bag--you can just keep flipping the bag over to move the juice around.)
And then there are times like now where you find you are running more hospice than hospital. And then you are faced with questions from your loving partner about What Next To Do. Questions of unnecessary suffering. Questions of the sustainability of care given. Questions of who will take the post as chicken-nurse once we leave (as these sicklies are the farm's chickens and not our own). All this questioning while gently skirting the god complex I had created around the chickens. Now it was Up To Me; whether they live or die. And if they were to die; whether that be gradual through deliberate neglect or sudden through execution. At first I thought I had a choice between the former but I realized with a cold heart it was a choice between the latter. Death this way or that.
1 large shallot, thinly sliced
On the outside, Cordatos looks like your ordinary pizzeria, but inside customers are offered something way too hot and spicy to be found on the menu. Lap dances. Yes, you read that correctly.
By the way, I commented on the lad with the furry yellow bike’s blog. It was moderated but he put up my comment anyway, he just didn’t answer my questions. He did not offer an explanation for the protest and did not offer his favourite remedy for saddle rash. So I still do not have closure on that bizarre event.
In 2008, having spent the better part of the decade making up for his five-year lost weekend, Robert Downey, Jr. finally reclaimed his rightful place at the top tier of the Hollywood gentry with a trio of hit movies. When he ushered in the summer blockbuster season with the spectacular Iron Man, it seemed only fitting that the fallen wunderkind should portray a boy genius forced to fight his way back to his former glory. His subsequent roles in Charlie Bartlett and Tropic Thunder were met with less acclaim, but the die had already been cast: Chaplin was back, and he was all out of bubblegum.
Tiny amt black for eyes
Kiwi- They will require the support of a trellis or fence.
PS: Ok. Tell me.
Writing at this level of intensity has been a weird experience, though. Sort of like NaNoWriMo, but without the camaraderie and support. It made good training for NaNo (I'll be writing the third book of the trilogy, 'Don't Fear The Reaper', for NaNo this year, and hoping to finish in even fewer days), but it was a brutal and life-consuming thing. I did manage to fulfil my obligations to my band, and complete Mariokart Wii, but that's about it. No blogging (I still haven't accepted my blog award from Kathleen Doyle - I'll get to it in the next few days, I swear!). No time with friends; even my housemates haven't seen a lot of me. I didn't even know there was rioting going on until last night (eerily, I burnt down half the city of Cohlin in the finale of 'Some Kind of Angel', and half a dozen hours later London was burning... Good job correlation doesn't imply causality, too, 'cuz there's lots of fire planned for 'Don't Fear the Reaper').
“I probably have it somewhere but it would take forever for me to find it,” I answered.
“If I’m here, sir. If not, I don’t know. He may not even come. Deviating from the viewing can produce strange results.”
When the media reports incorrect information or outright falsehoods, it becomes next to impossible for the American people to believe anything they see or hear.
THE DROWNING POOL and THE MAGIC FLUTES by Eva Ibbotson
If that seems vague...it is. Here's another definition: low-alcohol, but not low-taste. It's subjective.I think any definition should stick closely to that 4.5% ABV figure. I'll admit, it's my figure, but I reached it after much consideration. Simply, it's like speed limits. No one goes 55 mph in a 55 mph zone; you'd get run off the road. By saying 4.5%, we're letting you know that your 5.4% pale ale simply is not a session beer, quaffable and delightful though it is...which a 5% definition would make harder to sustain. I'd like to see American brewers working to get good flavor under 4.5%. It can certainly be done -- I've had them -- and you can do it without tart/souring or hopping to the bejayzus, although that works too (Lambrucha and Stone Levitation being excellent examples). Work with malts and yeast, and you can achieve amazing things; I've had them, too.
Since then, I’ve been freelancing for another organization in the same sector. It’s not that Senioritis, Ltd. is up-and-coming, or that the benefits are generous, or even that I enjoy my colleagues, who for the most part are cranky and delusional. It’s just a natural, organic fit.
Yet, is it impossible though?
One officer was taken to hospital with a head injury during the clashes, as about 50 men linked to the EDL were kept separate as they shouted abuse.
Forty years after Tibet, the Great Intelligence and it's Yeti were up to their old tricks again, this time in the London Underground. We also met Colonel Lethbridge-Stewart for the first time. In 1968 on a North Sea gas refinery the Doctor faced a parasitic seaweed creature, the Doctor used his Sonic Screwdriver for the first time and we bade farewell to Victoria Waterfield.
Measure out 1/3 to 1/2 cup of hot milk and whisk into the egg yolks in a slow steady stream. This will temper the eggs. Once tempered, slowly pour the mixture back into the sauce pan, whisking as you do. The hot milk cooks the egg. No raw egg worries.
Attila was Khan of the Huns from 434 until his death in 453. He was leader of the Hunnic Empire which stretched from Germany to the Ural River and from the Danube River to the Baltic Sea. In much of Western Europe, he is remembered as the epitome of cruelty and rapacity. An unsuccessful campaign in Persia was followed in 441 by an invasion of the Eastern Roman Empire, the success of which emboldened Attila to invade the West. He passed unhindered through Austria and Germany, across the Rhine into Gaul, plundering and devastating all in his path with a ferocity unparalleled in the records of barbarian invasions and compelling those he overcame to augment his mighty army. Attila drowned in his own blood on his wedding night. Source
Review by David Gordon Duke
Chocolate beans and jelly beans fit perfectly in this little bags which are from Pack-It-In. I have stocked up on these little bags so if you would like a pack of 25 bags popped in with any order of chocolate beans or jelly beans leave a note on your order and we can have your class christmas favours sorted out in no time. You can find these delicious beans in the lolly/candy section of the shop here. If you would prefer to buy a pack of 100 cello bags they are $5 - they have been added to the lolly/candy section of the shop but will only be available until Christmas.
In the South, people will bread and deep-fry about any edible substance. Meat, poultry, fish, animal byproducts, vegetables, fruits, almost anything. The cuisine is an agglomeration of Afro-American translocation, native cultures, European influences, economics, and local necessity. Add some Ranch dressing, and call it a meal! It is a good thing I am on the bike for 6 hours a day, otherwise I would have to go directly to the Coronary Care Unit.
The wind began to blow
It's underway from recycled yarn. This is a three-ply Merino, which in it's previous life received a blue ribbon from Judith MacKenzie at Black Sheep Gathering. I only wore the sweater a couple of times. It looked like a knitted sweatshirt.
This first sketch was the Design Team application:
Something borrowed or something blue, an old school hat or a pot of cold Irish stew?
Pour butter mixture into dry ingredients, forms into soft dough.
Update: At least some table-guests liked my food. Nothing was wasted, and I did cook for the extra unexpected visitor (who again didn’t show up this time).
and gown and cap—
follow any line to make up tic tac toe and if your really in for a big challenge use all 9 Now Our team was a little divided on this challenge so you might know notice there are 2 boards .... Yah I'm not using the pink one ... I must admit it the pink board was me being a smart ass but there are those on my team that OWN alot of Pink Stash. Me not so much so I've done 2 Rows in this one board
And it was bad spending, it was phony, it was debt. But Ben Bernanke says that America needs to go deeper into debt, that we have to spend more, that we have to act like there was a housing bubble, even though there isn’t. He wants to create some sort of bubble. His goal is to get Americans to spend, and he’s going to do that. By that he will destroy the dollar.
Warm up at RHHS: 3:25
I am not Steve Cotrell, nor am I Michael C. Cottrell, and I am not (currently) near London, laddie. I am not even on the ground.
Total e-commerce spending in the United States in 2008, the Internet research firm comScore reports. Online spending increased 7 percent last year—nothing like the years immediately prior, which saw growth rates near 20 percent.
This extremely dangerous blast moves towards every direction. Oh god of gods, what is it? Where does it come from? I don’t know.
Oh! Oh! Oh! Oh! Oh! Oh! Oh!
Blimey!
Remember, arguments are not merely about wasting time trying to persuade your opponent: in the end, hopefully you will come out with a firmer grasp on your own position or a new understanding of the issue. Sending your opponent on a wild goose chase for more evidence, especially with the presumption that your opponent hasn’t already done the research, won’t result in any new or better understanding, and so it should simply be rejected.
So I went to pick it up and this is the complete package he gave me:
Remove the potatoes from the heat, drain them in a colander and run cold water over the potatoes to stop the cooking. Dry the potatoes on paper towels or with clean dish towels. You want the potatoes to be pretty much dry.
Take, for instance, a loose historical overview. In the thought of Confucius it is social harmony that reigns supreme as an ideal; it is solid, pragmatic and binding upon people. Not to fit in with societal norms distances one from the order of things. Logic, on the other hand, is rebellious in its search for truth; it questions accepted norms and demands of its adherents a degree of imagination and independence that would, in purely Confucian terms, be considered as wilfully destroying social harmony. Its very willingness to upset harmony places it irrevocably outwith the Confucian model.
Jon Richard Grabowski, 33, New York, N.Y.
The multiple and proliferating streams of Critical Theory continue to enrich scholarly and research fields in the humanities and political sciences. In the fields of education theory to media analysis, from cultural theory to theories of ‘the city’, from aesthetics to theories of the law critical theorists continue to employ perspectives and approaches that challenge, provoke and subvert the standard clichés and tropes of empirical sociology and positivism in the humanities and political sciences.
“The AP is included as part of permits, permits under Article 153 of the Constitution, which guarantees Malay and Bumiputera rights along with reserve land, scholarships, government posts.”
Plus, it's Valentine's Day...not that that means anything, but I thought it was worth mentioning!
GODFLESH - Merciless - Columbia/Earache
I’m not planning any competitive excursions, just a weekly hack around the Gower peninsula or the South Downs. Having removed, and sold, all the gear-changing gubbins the road back to a full multiple-ratio MTB would be relatively expensive, so the simplified single speed option left me with only two changes to make: the gear ratio, namely the cog on the rear wheel, and the tyres, the current, slick, Continental Gatorskins wouldn’t really cut it in the mud.
with whispered declaration
delight in my interests, preferences and choices, just as I do for my kids,
I have lots left over and already have ambitious plans to make a Scotch egg variant… so watch this space! Meanwhile, I will leave you with this video from the World Black Pudding Championships in Ramsbottom, feat. the Hairy Bikers.
So far, so good. I've been keeping fairly busy and I'm not even close to being settled and organized. I was able to finally organize my kitchen, but the rest is a mess. And it's likely to stay that way for a while. I'm ok with that. It's mine and I can be as messy as I want to be and I love it!
I’m not sure why I’m writing a greeting here. I do that every time I try to start one of these – I guess I don’t see the point in writing if I’m not going to show it to anyone some day. Journals and diaries and those types of things all just seem silly to me, but my uncle always tells me that if I try to get past that general pointlessness that I’ll probably enjoy writing in them. He bought me this one here when I was about ten years old, but I never really took the time to write in it. It’s been somewhere near five years since then – we just moved and I’m bored. He’s at work, since my aunt hasn’t started working again just yet. My little cousin was just born, see, but they don’t want him to know I’m not his real brother until he’s older. I guess I can kind of understand that.
Nelson is the firstborn, the alpha-cat of the house. He is very fluffy, friendly, curious, nosy and he is very affectionate. He is not afraid of any visitors, and he loves to take part in all events from home.
Other DB'ers made savoury versions, too. Ham and cheese, pepperoni, and I can't remember what all else. I drooled a lot this month, watching other creations come to life on the DB forums! Have fun with this, and let me know how yours turns out!
(from Martha Steward's Living Magazine)
My grandfather, and later his son, my dad, often refer to cash as “BLOOD MONEY”. We are taught to look upon it as some sacrifice on the part of our elders who have sacrificed much to put food on the table. That is how hard it is to get it, only by working hard and going through all kinds of perils of the workplace. This generation, who’s gone through two world wars, will tell you, as I have been told, that they can slog all days and years, and still can’t be filthy rich!
The branches of the “copy” – of an actual grapevine – have little choice but to abide. They they have no consciousness or responsibility. But believers on the True Vine must abide in order to bear fruit. There is responsibility involved. “Abide” means to take up residence – to “remain.” Abiding is not intending to make a temporary home. People don’t normally go to a hotel or make an encampment with the intention of “abiding.”
"Sixty-two percent of publishers have plans to distribute and market their content via a tablet within the next two years, and only 52% intend to distribute content through dedicated e-reader devices. It should not be surprising, therefore, that consumers who currently own these devices do not broadly perceive the access to digital content to be on par with print," observed Jeanniey Mullen, Global EVP and CMO for Zinio and VIVmag.
Can Friendship’s flower droop on for years
Oscar G
St. Paul, pray for me. Intercede that grace may lead me to trust, to faithfulness and conviction that the promise you have seen come to fruition may fill my heart with longing for the crown of righteousness. I, too, have grown fat on the enticements and temptations of the world and long for a simple faith. St. Paul, pray that I run a good race, despite my weakness.
I am a very, very anxious person. I have now meditated on this particular one 3 separate times -- I've done it more than the others (at this level,) because I know it's going to be the hardest to deal with. It's a very intense experience. My body enters this state of discomfort and I feel like I can't keep my muscles still. Anyone who's ever experienced or read about restless leg syndrome - you could easily liken it to that experience. But all over. I can feel my eyelids flutter and my fingers move.
Thursday March 1st - Founder's Curmudgeon's Better Half & Harvietoun Ola Dubh 18
The Enigma machine was – and continued to be for many years – a near-perfect encryption device. A detailed description of why it works so well is here. No one would ever have been able to decipher German signals if not for a number of events.
Also I have inherited her love for flowers, although my love stems only from the fact that they are so beautiful. Hers is from the starkness of life and lack of anything remotely pretty, which was considered a sin by the harsh religion her parents confessed to.
His basic premise is that the problem of identity is in some ways the defining characteristic of modernity. On the one hand a deeply personal inward search for self; on the other a self viewed from the outside “as merely the point of intersection of impoverished data”. Identity vs identification, with what Brooks calls The Identity Paradigm as crucially important throughout modern Culture.
Yale, though, was also not impressed by the fact that three well known Muslim moderates were also part of YIISA’s program: lesbian Irshad Manji, German political scientist Bassam Tibi, and Bangladeshi Shoaib Choudhury. Taking this into account, the Yale decision to kill YIISA is also a decision against liberal or moderate Muslims who fight for an enlightened Islam, and a life without Sharia law, terror, and Islamic antisemitism.
the word of the Supreme Electoral Tribunal. The Miami Herald (12/1/09)
What does help are those Glade Plug-Ins.
I learned that Sam (author of the letter) is 23 and has left approx 200 letters (not all the same) all over Calgary, Out of the 200, they’ve only gotten about 10 responses. I’ve been bombarding him/her with questions about the letters, why did they send them out, what have the responses been like, what was the inspiration? Below are a few excerpts from the emails sent to me. This person is my hero.
At the time, I lived in Southern California, and the Beastie Boys did, too. It was kismet that we would run into one another and our eyes would lock and he’d be all, “YOU’RE DOPE.” And I’d be all, “Awwww yeeeah,” and we would shake our rumps. It was only a matter of time. And in that meantime, I convinced my friends Raina and Monica that they were totally meant to be with MCA and Mike D., the other Beastie Boys, much like we had chosen which Monkee was “ours” years before. “Mike D’s not that cute,” Monica complained. “He’s the dorky one. Why do I have to have the dorky one?” “But he’s cool,” I said. “And funny! Come on, the line, ‘Is your name Michael Diamond? No, my name’s Clarence’ is hilarious.” “Whatever,” she said, not buying it, but it was summer and we had nothing to do anyway. Luckily, Raina was thrilled with her MCA destiny, and our Beastie stalking had begun.
Nouriel Roubini, the NYU professor who predicted the current crisis, mentioned in a recent talk that throughout recorded history, there's been a more or less regular cycle of economic bubble-and-bust every ten years, with only one exception during which we managed to prevent such crises from arising for a solid fifty years: the fifty years while Glass-Steagall and other post-depression securities regulation remained in effect. Then we allowed Republicans and "New" Dems, financed by Free Marketeers, to dismantle it; and now we've got the biggest economic meltdown in history.
Our pastas came soon after and here’s what we ordered.
New Zealand Women’s Affairs Minister Hekia Parata told the BBC on Wednesday that people would be pleased there had been a resolution. “I think that it’s been pretty clear from the response that the remarks made were unacceptable to a wide range of people and my own experience of talking to businesses and across the country is it was a generally felt view that they were unacceptable,” she said.
2 tablespoons unsalted butter, melted and cooled
Tue-AM: 1:20, 2500'
In the story Hemon talks about seeing entire Bosnian families, distinctively shaped walking down city streets completely out of their depth and comfort zone. These people were refugees, and in Ireland the war brought the first large groups of refugees to Ireland that I can recall. I remember people talking about these people as if they had jumped on the boat eager to get as much as they could from Ireland, without any consideration for what the real situation in Ireland was. Sometimes Irish people forget that so many Irish have had to leave Ireland for a lot less worse than the reasons the Bosnian people came to Ireland.
By 2011 all public funding had been withdrawn and the DADI Awards was in the last year of its contract. But a number of individuals from the Leeds digital sector were motivated and wanted to take the festival on. At this point in the project my work became predominantly voluntary as the festival was no longer officially supported by the city council with staff time. Together we held regular meetings with the wider community and more than 40 volunteers created a programme of 56 events ranging from photography contests and games tournaments to informative panel debates, networking events and interactive geo-caching challenges.
This month Amanda has a very nice challenge for you;
I shall keep doing this for more as and when I can and I will post this up again if I have #2!
Here’s what Travel + Leisure said about PHL: Philadelphia’s airport is singled out for a lousy design and lack of cleanliness (20th), surly staff (20th), and long check-in and security lines (20th). The only thing worse is waiting for your bags, ranked 21st in efficiency (make that inefficiency). That its location came in at 13th is not much consolation.
With Earth saved from the Chitauri invasion and New York partially ruined SHIELD is threatened from the notorious councillors who launched the nuclear strike on Manhattan. Director Nick Fury is targeted by another organisation STRIKE who believe SHIELD placed the Earth in danger by creating the Avengers Initiative. But in the heavens an evil warlord named Thanos plans to bring terror and destruction to Earth. With his powers he plans to control each Avenger and destroy Earth from the inside out. However, in Asgard, Loki is on the brink of death from an unknown illness. For weeks he has visions of a world on fire, he insists it’s Earth but the Asgardians don’t believe him.
But my hope is also, and at the same time, that I would know Christ’s fellowship in suffering. That trials and tests would prove my faith genuine, and of greater worth than gold. That trials lead me towards Jesus, not away from him.
A layout will be drawn at random using random.org and will be posted on the blog on the following Monday after the link closes with the new challenge announcement. Our team will then send out a cute prize to the winner! International readers are welcome to play along but currently we are only shipping prize packs to the US and Canada due to shipping costs.
2. Essay demonstrates research on the topic.
As lover of all things steak, I was quite happy we each were given our own plate of this, thus I could eat it all.
Have you ever seen such a fabulous blue orchid? Well worth the $19 to enjoy months of beautiful blooms. I just place in 3 ice cubes a week to water it, and it's still just as beautiful as the day I bought it.
It’s getting late, but I want to see what comes next. There are bikers doing tricks in a park. After a minute or two, my mother and I figure out that the park is in San Diego. We are having fun. Chloe, on the other hand, isn’t amused. I decide she’s not in the mood. Perhaps she needs more privacy or maybe she will only tune in when she is feeling particularly desperate and lonely.
Dear Heavenly Father! Thank You for choosing me out of the world for Your glory. Thank You for the divine ability You’ve given me to be a success and a victor in life. I declare that my life is for Your praise, glory and beauty, as I take the necessary steps today to bring forth durable fruits unto Your Holy Name! Amen!
"The chief's speech was actually only two lines – eight words plus a healthy helping of wheeze and spittle . . . In translation from the Ojibwe, roughly: "You have all been a great disappointment. When are you leaving?"
But this attitude is exactly what pulls us down: betrayal — making Philippines a laughing stock in front of outsiders just so we’re not one of those stupid Filipinos; and throwing criticisms and not working on a solution. I’m not saying that people should all work in NGO’s or the government, or setting up social enterprises. All I’m saying is, if you care enough to throw shit at people, please care enough to do something.
include our resource box as listed above.
Eric is shy ♥
Lately, there has been quite a proliferation of breakfast options on this blog. With some rare exceptions and the typical eggs and toast, most of my breakfasts consist of sweet options – oatmeal, cereal and pancakes. I woke one more morning wanting savory French toast, and I was determined to make it happen.
Invest!
Tomorrow is the start of the new product launch for Copic and I'll be premiering some new Coffee Break Designs. Not to mention a contest for a prize!
In one of the Saturday or Sunday supplements there is a column by a woman who broke her back in a riding accident. At first I wondered how far this could travel. But this week you made me cry, I am so sorry you broke your back, you sound like a wonderfully funny, bright person to go riding with. I love riding horses but it is one of those things that are so far away from the day to day activities of my life that I only get to do it on the odd holiday to Tunisia or West Africa. I once stayed on a lesbian ranch in Nevada where all the women looked like Tammy Wynette or Dolly Parton. Big hair, set hard like candy, tight jeans, cowboy boots and dirty brown belts. God they were sexy! Every morning we would wake in their upmarket trailer and smoke cigarettes, drink coffee and then ride horses across the desert, every night we would drink beer in a lonesome Jacuzzi and look up at the starry sky. It was idyllic. If only I was a lesbian it would have been perfect.
As ever, if anyone knows the story behind the band Footsie (who I suspect were just some session folk) and the odd label Tangsong, please do drop me a line.
on a hillside
he looked like (and I'm using his own words) the kid on the cover of mad magazine.
Today I spent a good part of the day with my grandpa. He's in his final home, a beautiful hospice in the Veteran's Hospital in Palo Alto. Outside his bedroom window, he has a gorgeous view of the rolling hills and live oaks.
A weekend walk and pub lunch.
The look on her face was priceless, it brought me to tears.
There were 1000′s of people watching Phoenix grow last year…and I’m guessing that every single one of us were kinder, more loving and understanding people after watching that little family for those few months.
Delicately dexterous and ready to deal.
Seen the new chemo doctor in Illinois, she had MRI, Pet Scan and CT scans done on me...
This is my take, I've called it "My Heart Is Home To Stay".
I understand the intention of what Cormac McCarthy was trying to do. The eternal debate of nihilism and blind faith. Black and white. Light and darkness. He tries to turn traditional images of this on its head. Have the “white” character be filled with darkness and have the “black” character be very hopeful about life and God. I do not believe that a philosophy professor would have an existential conversation on a deep level with an ex-con.
2000 USCIS i600 fees ($720/ea x 2, $225/ea x 2 for required Embassy medical exams for kids)
Tens of millions die in a Holocaust combining the worst aspects of the sacking of Rome, Mexican narco-terrorism, and Central African butchery.
The 2011 Nobel Peace Prize winner Leymah Gbowee, of Liberia, was the most blunt, saying women had been too passive: “Where are the angry American women?” she asked.
So yeah, slowly building out the story for The Nine while I let Possession sit in the magical drawer (folder on my computer). I expect to be ready for outlining at least, if not already started that stage, by the time I pull Possession back out and reread it. I may read back through DM again beforehand, just to regain the perspective of “here’s where people will be when they come into the story.” We’ll see.
Nathan headed over to the bar.
The publishers are confident that this book will run and run. The words "Ist edition" appear on the cover itself and the website provides for a discount for those who wish to commit themselves now to the purchase of subsequent editions. Will it run and run? This reviewer thinks so -- if it's properly marketed and sensibly priced. It's far better focused than the publisher's previous attempt to do something along the same lines in the European Trade Mark Litigation Handbook, a title which sank so deeply that even attempts to dredge it up via Google have failed.
It's been a long time, yet here we are again. I wish I could have been writing to you over these last few months, but the truth of the matter is that some stories are better left unwritten on the World Wide Web. I'll just leave it at that.
Given my self-confessed obsession for yeasted baked goods, it only makes sense that the first post of the year is -yet another- bread recipe.
The centre has around 250 clients of all ages.
Hell, if I can do that, I can probably do anything.
“Oh,” she says. “How thoughtful.”
I'm getting hungry! Time to get the rest of dinner going.
Then the band returned to the site with original photographer Angus McBean to re-create the photograph intended for the ‘Get Back‘ album:
After Dave and I got married, I had about a week where I thought, “Wow! It’s strange to not be planning or up to our eyebrows in preparations!”
Across denominations, the net losses were uneven, with Catholics losing the highest proportion of childhood adherents — nearly 8 percent — followed by white mainline Protestant traditions, which lost 5 percent.We are now in a post-Christian America. No longer are people familar with bible stories or scripture. So many young people are completely "unchurched" and have no concept of apologetics or why sin is sin. God is a myth and all religions are equal in that all religions are inconsequential. And we wonder why the youth of our nation lack a moral compass. As does our President.
1. Whole seedless watermelons, .99/ea. at Newflower (through 5/12/10)
“Yea, why?”
Thanks again to everyone that has participated in Project 2.
A sea and air rescue was launched after his family raised the alarm but he was declared dead after his body was recovered from rocks at the base of the cliff.
I logged in with Blintz and found myself in the Thundering Steppes. I decided to just run out and get the quest update for Hadden’s Earring.
With a short drive to the Pacific Ocean, I had a relaxing and picturesque day at Moss Landing Beach and Elk Horn Slough with the kids during their vacation week. The lighting at the beach always seems to be right and the contrasting elements of white surf and darker sands sets up so well for photography.
Some hold that it should be possible to legally challenge political manifestos, yet where this has been attempted courts have held that an elected member ‘ought’ to give considerable weight, when deciding whether to implement policies put forward in a pre-election manifesto. However elected representatives must not treat themselves as irrevocably bound to carry out pre-announced policies contained in election manifestos. Moreover The Court of Appeal held that to hold that the pre-election promises bound a newly elected Government could well be inimical to good government. It was one thing to say that an administration properly and morally ought to have regard to its pre-election promises. It was another to say that it must have regard to them and a yet further thing to say that it must ordinarily act on them. The law went nowhere near that. The Court of Appeal emphasised that it did not wish any encouragement to politicians to be extravagant in their pre-election promises, but when a party elected into office fails to keep its election promises, the consequences should be political and not legal. (source) So we see that pre-election promises are not legally enforceable, which begs the question why do politicians make pre-election promises that they cannot keep? This may be because it is easy to promise dramatic changes to the law when not in Government, but more difficult to make them work in practice. Also, when elected, the party may have more information available to them and realise that the pre-election promises are not very practical. On that last point I would contend that if the required research had been carried out properly then politicians would be aware of the point about practicality. This is especially so where this country's membership of the European Union is concerned and when politicians promise action in an area that is a competence of the EU.
So if you decide to save money by manually making changes in your registry, you’re risking making a mistake. And you might end up having to pay someone later to fix it. Consider carefully before you do anything to your Microsoft Windows registry.
The winners of the Festival competition were announced during the meal and once again it was clear just how much talent and potential there was in that room. With only my teensy evening bag, I found myself in the almost unique position of realising I didn't have pen and notebook to hand, so I didn't manage to record the shortlist. (Though I couldn't possibly forget the well-deserved inclusion of the lovely John Taylor of Word Cloud renown).
10. Age of iniquity
Perfection, in other words, it is not a prerequisite or even a characteristic of great art. The onus of perfectibility may be more of an impediment to achieving something substantial that it is a goad to that end. Walter Kaufmann, best known as Friedrich Nietzsche’s translator, pointed out that all the great philosophers have been amateurs. Kaufmann wrote that in the 1950s, but in the last sixty-some years I don’t think the world has produced anyone to rival Immanuel Kant, Plato or Nietzsche himself. This may not be an accident. I think it may point to a correspondence between amateurism and greatness. This is hard for us to accept, we who believe that achieving anything worthwhile is always the result of hard work.
there, now,” said Mrs Cohen. “Oh you have been so brave. But it’s all right not to be brave all of the time.” She stroked Renate’s hair. She turned to the rest of the class. “Does anyone have any idea why Renate has come here?” she asked.
where it’s
I wake in the middle of the night to the yowling. If you’ve ever heard a cat in heat, you have the beginnings of knowing this sound. Remember that sound, the one of the cat in heat. Now imagine it is plaintive instead of urgent, sad instead of excited, emerging from the soul of the cat, instead of its sex. Now you know the sound of “yowling” and how it can wake you in the middle of the night, full of fright. I call to my cat. Make the clicking sounds with my tongue against the soft palate to gain her attention then call her name. “here, Sally Brown.” I hear the pitter pat and click-clack of paws and claws against the linoleum floor. There is a pause as the sound reaches the edge of my bed, and then I feel the tell-tale landing on the mattress besides my head. I reach out for her, to stroke her, to calm her night terrors, but my hand doesn’t meet her warm soft fur. It passes through a freezing cold bubble and my body becomes paralyzed. She is not there. She died, a few days ago and now that I’ve buried her, she only comes out at night. I feel her climb up onto my chest like she used to and lay down, her whiskers barely touching my face and remember, cats can steal your breath. If that is the case, Can a ghost cat steal your soul?
“To be very frank, some leaders also asked me why I wanted to bring up this old matter. They neither supported me or were against me at first. But later on they gave me their moral support.
For at least the first 2 - 3 weeks of any new year it is tough to remember to write whatever the actual new year is....in this case "2012". As I worked on yesterday's blog I hit the same snag. I almost published with the wrong year.
facing a vagina at close range, ready to eat away
I started January off by making 2 quilts. An easy, easy pattern that has jumped to the top of my favorite quick quilt patterns.
Orna Ross launched The Alliance of Independent Authors, and maybe there is a potential fix there. It will still need one or more of the UK author and publisher guilds on board if this is to truly work.
Dimma Live in Concert @ New York 20. and 21. December 2007
Charles arrived with a bottle of Suzanne’s favourite red wine tucked under his arm, and a bunch of flowers. He looked drained, but she could see he’d made an effort. He had taken note that she always liked to have freshly-cut flowers in her house. “Something smells good” he said, kissing her on the cheek.
“Loud and clear,” Murray Bedward, EM Carchase Correspondent, replied.
Axelrod: well this whole conversation is stupid
It appeared to this seasoned observer that the committee had reverted to the bad old, sad old days of the Gang of Two, when the whim of the officers ruled with not even a token whiff of a constitution or proper procedure. The end result was an AGM that totally missed the point: that an AGM’s main objective is to choose a new committee and officers for the coming year (FoTL constitution 2011 sec. 7.3). As it was, this was treated almost as an afterthought, being only ranked at, coincidentally, No. 7 on the agenda: “Re-election of Officers and the appointment of new committee members.” And never was a Freudian slip more accurately made! For that is exactly what happened - well, the first part anyway. The officers were all duly re-elected. No nominations for the committee were first sought (and a new committee formed), rather the three officers presented themselves as incumbents and were duly voted in – bit of a lack of choice, really. We then had the rather odd decision by the Secretary to record that all three had received 15 votes, despite one of them having only received 14! [That's surely just nit-picking. Ed.] The matter of having a new committee was dispensed with altogether, as was the need to ensure that all those voting for the “re-election” of the officers were in fact members of Friends of The Level. When it was pointed out that very few of those present were in fact members (FoTL constitution 2011, sec. 4 ), it was promptly ruled that everyone present was a member by dint of filling in the attendance sheet! Did everyone fill it in? No one checked… One “new member” quite rightly pointed out that she was unaware that she was joining FoTL by adding her name to the list. But hey, minor detail!
I’m going into the studio in June to record the 2 songs on my video so you guys can hear how really awesome they are when properly recorded.
What's interesting to me is not that we needed someone to tell us the French are a bunch of "glass-isn't-half-empty-it's-fucking-dryer-than-a-bone" types.
There was only one thing that I just KNEW was going to make this day more bearable. The fact that I was supposed to be able to rejoice in the knowledge that we were 11 weeks pregnant with our second baby.
or your white-collar misunderstandings.
Even though the BNP have proscribed the EDL the media treat them as interchangeable as they try to slot the BNP into their ideology as “thugs” and “knuckle draggers.”
About Cravings:
On 18 May, 1539, de Soto set sail , (leaving his bride in Cuba) with a fleet of nine vessels. He had with him 1000 men exclusive of the sailors, all well armed and making up what was considered to be the best equipped expedition that had ever set out for conquest in the New World. Some sources listed him as leaving in 1538 with seven ships, about 600 men, 250 horses, and many bloodhounds.
To start, I think the most important aspect to remember when dealing with the death of a close family member is that we ALL grieve differently. This is not just because as men and women we deal with issues in our own ways, but our fundamental beliefs (what happens after death?), our ending relationship to the deceased and lastly our current daily struggles have quite an impact on how we chose to absorb and digest the event as a whole.
I've been thinking about growing orchids for probably several years now, ever since they have made a showing in this area in the local commercial greenhouses and so forth. I was always aware of them in some background sort of manner, and being a devout fan of Rex Stout's Nero Wolfe series I was hard pressed not to learn the basics of orchids, but I never considered myself an orchid fan until I began seeing them up close and in person, which is saying something in this tiny backwater town.
Another method is to get a saucer, put a layer of marbles in the bottom and partially fill the saucer with water. Place the container on top of the marbles. Don’t let the pot sit in the water. The idea is to capture evaporating moisture, not wick it into the root system and cause root rot.
Been talking a lot to God about it.
5. Mac Taylor is the persistent type. He’s been trailing a woman who looked like his best friend’s dead wife. Force of nature: Torrential rain
Cooper’s did very well and by the time the 1960s rolled around it had grown into a successful chain of supermarkets.
A melody in a bottle, a sonnet without ice,
What is concerning parents and children even more is that on Friday, parents found out that asbestos removal will start tonight. They are rightfully angry that they have not received enough warning.
It’s pretty tight, but Ronnie’s defending it well – and he’s out.
“When your parents were teaching you, they told you to go to Istris in an emergency, didn’t they?” Arnen sighed, fingering a peculiar ring on his finger adorned by a white star.
But in order to do that, there would have to be some changes to the core structure of the game.
17. Have you always been this cute, or did you have to work at it?
INSPIRATIONAL VIDEO OF THE DAY:
roast for 25-30 minutes until edges start to brown.
over and out for now
· Sit on the grass and watch how it’s constantly moving and shifting. Watch to see if any tiny creatures jump or fly by. Imagine how big the area would look to a small bug.
SA: The more pressing question for me is how my writing is going to fit into their lives. And I don't entirely know the answer. Obviously, I've written a good deal about my life. But there is a realm of privacy, both for me and for my wife and kids, and that's something I take seriously. It's part of the reason I stopped blogging for Babble. And I'm sure I'll hold back on writing more and more stuff as they and their friends become readers. Nobody wants to go through adolescence with their dad taking notes and writing "humorous" columns about them. That being said, my wife and I hope we're raising the sort of kids who recognize the value of storytelling. (We had considered not teaching the children to read, but they seem to be picking it up pretty quickly.) My hunch is that they'll want nothing to do with our work. But we certainly can't hide what we do. Honesty is always the best policy. Or at least, the inevitable one.
Beyond the point paternalistic assumption that all minorities are poor or working-class, it’s unclear how lowering standards helps anyone, including poor or working-class students. Indeed, we had this debate at CUNY, when disastrous policies along the lines recommended by Harris devalued a CUNY degree in the 1980s and early 1990s; the institution has revived only through the initiatives of Chancellor Matthew Goldstein, who has advocated raising standards across the board.
In the run-up to the next KOLT production in our REVELATIONS 2012 season, Smudge, we are highlighting the wonderful actors contributing their time, energy and talents to this production. Last week’s post was a dialogue with cast member Eric Baldwin, who plays Pete. This post throws a spotlight on the talented Barry Hubbard, who plays expectant father Nicholas.
Chunky heels... I'm tired of skinning my stilettos...
- Foreigners who violate the terms of their visa may be sentenced to up to six years in prison (Articles 119, 120 and 121). Foreigners who misrepresent the terms of their visa while in Mexico — such as working with out a permit — can also be imprisoned.
A way to Tattoo your phone number right on
“Signs of slowing economic growth and inflation remaining subdued allowed yields on Treasury bonds to ease somewhat and brought most mortgage rates to new all-time record lows this week,” Freddie Chief Economist Frank Nothaft said in response to the new rate depth.
BASIC MATH SKILLS are a must for anyone who wishes any kind of success in the world. Addition, Subtraction, Multiplication, and Division in lightening speed using strong mental math skills will make all higher level math go so much faster! Mad Dog Math makes learning these basic skills FUN and you can rest from using the flash cards and all the grueling processes of the past. Want your kids to LOVE math at a young age? Try Mad Dog Math~and you can sign up for the FREE trail period too HERE!
Butter a glass pan and throw this mixture in the pan. Spread the parmigiano and the bread crumbs on top and bake in a preheated oven at 400 F/200 C for half an hour or until a nice golden color is formed on the top.
I don’t mean to make light of a situation that doubtless many find uncomfortable or even downright scary. Perhaps this is an opportunity for each of us to reflect on our own career or employment situation and find new reasons for gratitude. And while we’re at it, can we look for the gig workers in our midst and find a way to make their day just a little easier?
gavotting round the maypole
Yet there is austerity – people are struggling out there, we may not have starvation but everywhere you’ll see faces telling you it’s tough. As I said, watch those adverts – not just the offers of loans or the debt scams but the everyday adverts. Look at the styling, consider the way we now see less of the flash, hedonistic and aspiration imagery and instead get and older, solid, calming language.
“Lower our taxes and we’ll call it even,” the manager replied.
White Heat
*CORRECTION. I had figured ERAs wrong ... Baseball Reference, which is the greatest site on planet Earth, has one quirk where in their statistics they mark 1/3 of an inning as .1 and two-thirds of an inning as .2. I have no idea why they do this but whenever i use their stats this messes me up. Mike Marshall threw 1,387 2/3 innings in his career, and is you figure those 2/3 of an inning at .2 he is the pitcher closes to Pi. However, when you note it correctly, Marshall is actually not the closest to Pi. The closes it Mel Queen. Ah well. It's still cool that Dr. Mike Marshall, who was always as much a mathematician as pitcher, finished with a 3.14 ERA.
Let the rain fall on me and wash away everything
So, I gathered items out of the pantry and made a delicious, moist cake. I used the cake mix, a large chocolate pudding, vegetable oil, milk, and topped it off with random chocolate chips. It was SO divine! The cherry chips were an added punch of flavor!
I just wanted to share a couple of pointers I discovered:
But sophomore year was the year of my undoing. It started off with the unbelievable tragedy that was 9/11, which made me look at my priorities and doubt that I wanted to be so far away from my family. Then two more major switches, including one into the honors math program, where I took Calculus III and IV simultaneously to catch up with the other seven students in the program who were all brilliant. The most brilliant and intimidating one was a math genius from a local high school. I felt like a very small fish in a big pond.
“You must have been talking to yourself because nobody else wants to talk to you.”
First thing Pat did was look around to make sure everything else was found and in it's usual place, with an OCD fit that wasn't hard to trace. There it was all nice and neat. The only thing that was moved was his seat, as it can roll and once in a while Miss Priss and I take it for a stroll.
As I have mentioned before (see Disclaimer No. 2), my Spanish is horrible, but my lovely wife (and backed up by Google Translate) told me that parada means “stop”.
NOTE: And I saw an angel standing in the sun; and he cried with a loud voice, saying to all the fowls that fly in the midst of heaven, Come and gather yourselves together unto the supper of the great God; That ye may eat the flesh of kings, and the flesh of captains, and the flesh of mighty men, and the flesh of horses, and of them that sit on them, and the flesh of all men, both free and bond, both small and great. And I saw the beast, and the kings of the earth, and their armies, gathered together to make war against him that sat on the horse, and against his army.
I wanted my readers to see how the money was spent, and the faces of the people that the contributions affected. Most of the money went to the poorest children, those in orphanages. More than anything, this is about celebrating how God used our smallest effort and truly made it greater than what it was, to glorify His kingdom.
So FORGET EVERYTHING YOU’VE EVER HEARD about fly fishing like a pro up until now.
My friend Morghen and I have a weird friendship to everyone else but us. We knew each other when we were little, but we went to separate schools and didn't really talk at all until a few years ago, when Facebook started connecting people. She lives nine hours away from me, but we keep in touch through Blogger, Facebook and the occasional text message conversation. (I hate talking on the phone unless it's too much to type.)
Those who can't beat, cheat!
See below link for an example of where the ‘Makow Mindset’ hails from :
I will get these in the post as soon as possible.
* “Why do you do the things you do?”
Technology is also the only thing Robert Zemeckis's most recent performance-capture animated projects, The Polar Express (2004) and Beowulf (2007), leave you with—at least, that's what many of his harshest critics have said about them. I still haven't seen Beowulf, but I was admittedly a skeptic of the technique after The Polar Express—not so much because of motion capture's lack of visual warmth (or what some might call the "dead-eyes" problem) as with the technology being totally in sync with a distinct chilliness at the heart of Zemeckis's conception (Santa Claus elevated to the level of religious myth, with odd echoes of Riefenstahl to some of the imagery). I can't say that I experienced a road-to-Damascus moment with his latest, A Christmas Carol; nevertheless, after finally seeing it in 3-D a few days before Christmas, I finally grasp what Zemeckis sees in performance capture.
Waist: 56 inches Waist: 55 inches
This next one is for my sister. She loves cats - we call her "The Crazy Cat Lady" - and so I always make cards for her that have cats on them. She always love them, and keeps every single one. I colored the cats with a mix of Copics and Prismacolors and put on a sentiment sticker and some pretty buttons from my extensive button collection, otherwise known as the "Stash"!
--Jack Kerouac (1961)
She is young,
The Lunar New Year is celebrated primarily by people of Chinese, Korean, Vietnamese, Tibetan and Mongolian heritage in many parts of the world. Parades, parties and other special events are common. Images associated with some of these widespread customs are depicted in the Celebrating Lunar New Year series.
I've just received a copy of my calendar book for 2011. Seeing my work in print seems like yet another journey to fantasy land.
During a recent visit to my favorite Petro-cum-Kangaroo, the conversion process was kicking into high gear. Workers outside had blocked off several parking spaces so they could install a large new billboard over the entryway. Inside, at least a dozen cashiers were tripping over each other behind the counter, watching a trainer explain the new check-out terminals. Wallpaper was being stripped above the coffee machines, as customers at the self-serve struggled to avoid getting dried paste with their cream and sugar. Convenience was everywhere.
For lots of reasons.
On a completely unrelated matter, I am posting five mistakes of which I am shamelessly guilty, because if you can’t admit them to your friends without fear of judgment, whom else do you have, right? (And because I miss you girls a lot, so if I could just open an imaginary portal where we can talk, I’d be more than happy to jump into that.)
There isn’t anything dreadful about it, not at all, at least for the majority of patrons and workers.
The setting of the play was the rooms those in hiding had to share. The main focus was on the relationships that were tested and developed during this time. Part of the play was narrated by “Anne” reading from her diary. The timeframe was from the beginning of their time in seclusion to their discovery by the Nazis two years later. At the end, Anne’s father, Otto Frank, revisits the annex and gives a touching monologue about the fate of his family and friends. I’m pretty sure there weren’t many dry eyes in the room. The play goes dark on Anne’s words from her diary:
* A Hen in the Wardrobe is the first book in the Cinnamon Grove series. Does the next book The Black Cat Detectives also feature Ramzi and his friends and family?
The man pulled out a firearm and tried to drive over the metro police officer before speeding away. A chase ensued.
The million dollar question that everyone always seems to ask is, "How much is the pre-fixe weekend lunch menu?" The answer is simple: $25, and worth every penny. Check it out for yourself, and let me know what ya think! Cheers! -F. Scott
If you look to your left you will see the kitchen area, as well as the living room and the small hallway to the master bedroom. From the kitchen you can get to the laundry area and out the back door to a nice big deck. You can also go into the master bathroom from the laundry area as well as from the bedroom.
She was only going out twice a week, to have her hair done and pick up her Jenny Craig food...but going grocery shopping is too much and she needs someone to go for her. Last week she did not even go to Jenny Craig.
"I mean it," Jessica said.
Until next time...slow down and enjoy all the wonderful parts of this Christmas season!
Julius Malema, the ambitious, firebrand leader of the South African ruling party's youth wing, Thursday called for the nationalization of mines and seizure of land without compensation — policies the government has repeatedly ruled out in the past.
More time passes. "Toll booth." I see the sign about checking brakes. I check my brakes. They work good. Whew. Rain pelting down, we get to the line. "Cool only one van. This should go fast," I say.
I did use the stand mixer to blend the batter but a whisk and a bit of labor will do the trick just as nicely.
We decide on a palate cleanser of Budvar to complete the night and as I sipped, I tried to nail just exactly what it is that makes these places feel so different to so many other pubs. It’s not just the beers, although that’s a ‘gimme’ and it’s not just the decorative touches or the night view of the surrounding suburbs from the windows – it’s something else again.
(Click picture to play)
The proverb ʻold habits die hardʼ sums up how we find making changes in our lives difficult. How do we know how to change a habit or what to change it to if we have not had guidance or gained an understanding of why?
*Inside Phreak’s mind…*
Google, Facebook, Skype and other local Internet companies contacted by the Mercury News declined to comment on the proposal. But Jeff Chester, executive director of the Center for Digital Democracy, a group that promotes the rights and interests of online consumers, said it “would give away the digital keys to our consumer data kingdom.”
He was defeated by Wladimir Klitschko in Hamburg last summer and promptly retired from the sport.
What do you think? Do you like this look? Have you tried it before, or do you plan on trying it?
